It was fantastic to read about Jock and Jane. They are two of my favorite characters in Johansen’s books. They are repeated and it is fun to read from when they are younger and to see how they are developed through the books. Jock’s role is intriguing in the books. He plays the mercernary with a heart but still very confused. Because of this his character is enduring.
In an attempt to restore some perspective to the overblown claims about online advertising and social media, a few years ago I produced a list called The Top 10 Double-Secret Unknown Facts About Advertising.
* Buy from a merchant you trust rather than one you haven't dealt with before. And ideally one local to you who is not going to risk losing your custom.
Feminism came up at the right time to rescue women who were bombarded with stereotypical images of the definition of womanhood. Feminism helped many women to come out of their shells and understand their worth. No wonder, women gradually fought for their rights and became successful albeit after a lot of struggle. But then, we are not discussing the issue of feminism. The matter is about how during the course of the effort to acquire equality, many women have taken over the mantle of chauvinism. Feminism has quietly transformed into female chauvinism. Just like how a group of men (not all mind you) came up with chauvinist ideas about women, women (again, not all) are coming up with chauvinist views about men today. They are displaying the same kind of arrogant superiority over men that used to be displayed before the feminist revolution. There were lesser choices available for women then. Today, women are everywhere – they are free to make their choices be it in the field of education, choice of mate, social set-up and the like. Again, this does not apply to all women; this certainly does not generalize all categories of women. After all, all women cannot be accused of being female chauvinist pigs. Coming back to female chauvinists, if there is a rape then all men are wild animals who know nothing better. Till women get things going smoothly, it’s fine but the moment they are restricted even for valid reasons, they jump up and cry foul.
Jack Nicholson told me, that A SAFE PLACE would be a failure in America. He said, that I should dub everyone in French, and change my name from Henry Jaglom to Henri Jaglum and release it. He said the film would be lauded as the greatest film since the work of Godard and Fellini. He was joking of course, but here, forty years later, with this Criterion release, the irony is very present, however belated, and it feels great.
As I was at an emotionally better place, I was able to not become upset about this. I fed her and then we sat together on her mat to play. Her calmness lasted about 30 minutes and then she started on her irritable sounds. I thought to myself, this isn't right.
Reading a series out of order is not something I normally do but I found with the series Governess Brides that is possible. Each book is a separate story that is being told. But I still started at the beginning of the series with the first book Rules of Surrender as I was able to get my hands on it.
Fox’s character design is still in play, but Cole has begin to use his own wild page layouts and artful titling (a la Eisner’s SPIRIT splashes). It’s outrageous that Cole would design new title art for a ONE page strip. Amazing!
Cecilia Robert
The event will also feature:
Into a big canvas bag.
I hope your weekend was wonderful too.
To see over 500 varieties of dahlias go to the Dahlia Dell at Golden Gate Park. Since 1920, Golden Gate park along with the Dahlia Society of Californina (DSC) has maintained this garden honoring dahlias.
Luckily, he’s willing to try new things and genuinely likes beans and most vegetables. He’s even becoming interested in cooking—thanks, in large part, to the fact that his middle school has mandatory classes in cooking and baking, a rarity these days.
I am extremely excited to say that since school has started we eat breakfast together as a family. I am very proud of myself for this as I am not a morning person. This means that we eat 2 meals together everyday. (it also means that I am always cooking). It is a lot of work but it makes me so happy!
And actually, it’s not the full song, but the bridge.
Within a week I was back.. because he was having attacks twice a day or more..
The issue here is not TDS's conduct, but Judge Keller's conduct. The Special Master's conclusions concerning causation are irrelevant to the issue of whether Judge Keller by her conduct violated the constitutional, statutory and canon provisions cited by the examiner. The Commission should not be diverted by the Special Master's erroneous attempt to frame this case in terms of who ultimately caused the failure of the USSC to grant a stay.Instead of focusing on TDS, said examiners, "Judge Keller's conduct on September 25, 2007 should be examined based on what she knew, heard, thought, said, did, decided, and failed to do - and not on things she didn't know."
Stage 8 in Added Collect 80 assistant coins.
The first step of this transformation was to get the bases (I wanted closed storage at the bottom instead of shelves like Emily’s). But we couldn’t do much with those until a big step was done – and that got done today! WHOO!
and the town was alive!!
I remember years ago trying to persuade my grandmother to use a phone box. Just a receiver, and button A and button B. Simple. But no. Not simple at all. Brought up at a time when there were no cars or phones, Granny had come a long way, but that was as far as she was prepared to go. Button A and button B were far too complicated. She wasn't going near them, thank you very much. What was the world coming to?
The Secret Service submitted a detailed report about what exactly happened on the night that a dozen agents were partying at a bar in Cartagena while in the country to protect the President.
4. Isabeau-Dakota Application
And chat and chat and chat and chat.
Pre-heat the oven to 425 C. Fill a loaf pan with water and keep it inside the oven. Steam from this will give the bread a nice crust and chewy inside. Bake the loaf for 35- 45 mns. Cool it over a wire rack and enjoy….
"In the past years, carefully calculated projections of world population in 2010 have gone from 20 billion, to 15, to 11, to now 9 billion15. This says two things: first, we’ve been persistently overestimating our growth rates16-18. Second, every time we found out we were wrong – even by a magnitude of 11 billion - it didn’t worry us at all. In fact, most of us were glad about it. Though it did raise a few concerns, nobody was too bothered about it."
12.) Black Sabbath - Paranoid - A lot to choose from with these guys.
88. Of all the things that drive men to sea, the most common disaster, I've come to learn, is women. —Charles Johnson, Middle Passage (1990)
Drowning, a calling, from the bleak fields of depression,
Some boxes are full of silverware. Baby spoons that were used to feed me as but an infant- feed me on neglect that I not know I deserve to be seen. There are forks of indifference and using from my toddlerhood that prodded me to not see myself, to learn to hide from their jab. Then there are the knives, kept sharpened on the anger, received and grown. I remove them gently, in longing for what should have been. I dip each in the cleansing mixture of my tears of a women’s remembering her child within and God’s love to then be polished to a shine. The tarnishing of a child’s fury and whys to be wiped away.
Problem is, she drinks a lot and she's accident prone. Things that don't go together very well. Last time she visited me in Paris she ended up in hospital having dislocated her arm. She did this when she tripped in the middle of the road in front of the Eiffel Tower. When I asked why she wasn't watching where she was going she said simply that she hadn't seen anything quite so phallic in a long time and was just 'admiring its beauty'....
The witness is questioned by the attorney who has ordered the deposition, in ‘direct examination’. Following the direct examination, the witness is then cross-examined by the other attorneys. A court reporter is present in order to make an accurate stenographic record of the statements, usually by transcription, using stenographic equipment. Audio or video recordings may also be taken if the witness is unable to appear at trial.
Nor is there wanting in the press
I skip the smileys and still feel confident that I won’t be misunderstood only when I send messages to my closest friends. Don’t get me wrong. I love smileys. I still use them with my closest friends, but only for emphasis – like an exclamation point.
If it means that I’ll never have to give up my Monmouth Park, then I guess it does. Because as much as I don’t like change, even when change could be a good thing, I like losing Monmouth Park even less. If there was a day that I couldn’t go to Monmouth Park to enjoy the day, I’d be incredibly sad.
So how are we going to change our drinking habits? In my opinion these advertising campaigns will have little or no affect, people will only learn from experience. My ramblings will probably be forgotten before the next session and Irish throughout the country will continue to do what we seemingly do best, drink until we more than likely drop!
Why does our government keep hiring tyrants like this from ex-Communist and Nazi regimes? Let us not forget the hundreds of Nazi war criminals the US gave refuge to following WW2.
O2 is the latest in a string of companies to launch mobile payment systems. Barclays launched its Pingit app, which transfers money between bank accounts, earlier this year, and online payment service Paypal’s app can send money to other PayPal users.
After the Julie Q&A was the Buffy photo ops portion of my day – I went for a Julie photo first, then waited around with the Toronto Buffy Fan club crew until we got our big group pictures with all five buffyfest stars. There were enough of us that the fans had to be split up into two groups, so I was in the ‘costumes’ group because I’d dressed up in my Simon Tam outfit.
* Any time the market ends below where it started the year or below its high point of March/April had a tendency to be the beginning of a new cyclical bear market. These years typically see tremendous volatility without much progress. Examples include 2000 and 2007. 2011 was right up there as well but I’m convinced that central bank intervention (specifically the LTRO in Europe) is what prevented 2011 from being the beginning of another cyclical bear market.
Pour the whole thing to a baking tray, cover it with foil and put it inside the oven for two to four hours. Keep checking at intervals.
5) Turn over the back piece and sew a brooch clasp in place with a double thickness of matching thread. If you're using a safety pin, use an extra bit of felt to sew it in place (see the end of this tutorial for more info on how to do this).
would have spent 2 years in jail. The State has lined up
Enjoy :D
…SE AZ/SRN NM INTO FAR W TX THIS AFTN/EVE…
I simply love the delicate bloom and the soothing colors.
Seeing as there wasn’t a whole lot to do, and I wasn’t at all prepared for the beach situation, I spent most of my time in Old Nice. As usual, if it has the word “Old” in it, it’s probably charming.
On one side I had the large tapestry and one piece of the navy polka dots and along the back I had one of the tarps to really block my tent from the people camping behind us. The second piece of navy polka dots was just wide enough to cover the mesh on the last side of the tent, but I wish I had a few more pieces so it would have gone all the way down. If the wind caught the fabric in the right way, one could still see inside my tent. But it was fine because that side of my tent faced my friend's tent and not some stranger's.
Cuba Standard:
I haven’t yet seen Neo Rauch’s monumental painting Para, 2007 at the Met in New York. I know it only from reproduction. I also know it is sacrilege to write of a painting from such a faulty source. But a blog is an informal forum and I cannot resist.
The Foundation says that routine manufacturing has been started, so that any backlogs should be cleared soon, and that the reaction so far from students has been very positive.
The devastation caused in South East Asia by the cataclysmic Tsunami wave on Boxing Day 2004 was a significant reminder of the power of nature. Over 310,000 people were to lose their lives in many different countries, some as far away as five thousand miles from the earthquake that triggered the catastrophe. Nobody could fail to be moved by the images beamed around the world of entire regions that, put simply, were no longer there anymore as the wave had erased it all in one of history’s great natural disasters. It also, for some researchers, revealed one of the darker sides of mankind, the Tsunami Bomb.
John McCarthy tomorrow....yes, that's tomorrow, Saturday 12 November at 10.00 am UK time. Very exciting and a bit scary, to be sure. I hope you can listen to it if you're home with the radio on. And if the timing doesn't work for you, you'll be able to listen to it on their Iplayer here. I'll be putting it up on some sort of podcast site too and I'll let you know how to access that, as soon as I know. And for you non-UK listeners out there, don't worry. You'll be able to access the Radio 4 site and listen to it from there at your convenience. I do think it will be a fascinating discussion about Cambodia, "ethical tourism," and of course, why I've become so intrigued and committed to the place. Do listen, if you can.
*Unpack, check and repack my “Talk-Bags” of books & rough proofs and so on that accompany my visits.
At that moment this distraught mother went into overdrive. I don't think I have ever texted so many complete sentence as quickly as that in my life. I was a woman possessed. The reception was poor and the land lines were not open. We had to rely on what little text messages we could get thru.
His revival could possibly save the universe.
”I just can’t stand individual awards,” Meyer said. ‘The way I measure — and the way people should measure — these great athletes is, `How many championships have they won?’ ”
6. I love Harry Potter.
3. Put peppers in bowl and cover it with plastic wrap for 5 minutes.
There are thousands of villas to hire in Corfu. If you travel with others, a unit with several bedrooms and bathrooms will let you split your lodging costs with other friends or alone; celebrate it in the best mexico vacation destinations, if you book your unit for the romantic vacation destinations or assistance with a fully equipped and retaining an all-important authenticity, Corfu holiday villas offer the best mexico vacation destinations of authentic yet modern holidaying. If you think a family holiday park is top notch too, with an indoor swimming pool, they'll also be able to engage in the best mexico vacation destinations of the mouse away.
Dalton: “Oh, yeah. You know those lists they put together at newspapers or U.S. World News and Report or whatever?”
I went through2 1/2 weeks of searching for them on craigslist. The girls got to draw (fabric markers) on their own pea pillow.
Anyone who knows me that I am horrible at being fake. My emotions fly to my face before my mind even registers it, and then I'm left to reign in the situation with my words. Therefore, I knew the "faking" part was going to be tough.
I have a bunch of random things kicking around to post, so here's a mish mash of things.
I don’t often read children’s books, not having any children myself, but I really enjoyed this one! My only complaint is that it simply isn’t long enough. I would like to see Grant write a whole series of them – kind of like the Nancy Drew books I read when I was a kid.
It all started on Wednesday, October 12th. I was feeling under the weather, so I called in sick to work. Now even though I really was sick, *cough cough*, I also felt like I could barely get out of bed emotionally. So I slept until 10:30, then spent the day eating comfort carbs and drinking hot tea. And I caught up on a lot of TV.
I went to school and saw that Daniel and Clara were missing!
Some people create a simple blog for just a hobby to get away from the ordinary daily life, and in time monetize on that blog by placing Google Adsense on it. If you take the whole process of establishing blogs in a different manner correctly by looking at is as a true business, no different than any other biz then you could replace your day job becoming that high-end entrepreneur you had imagined being one day running a network of successful blogs.
I'm having a huge debate in my head right now. A few years ago I rode in a couple bike events with my good friend Donna. I kinda gained weight (kinda.....hardy har har....I DID) and stopped riding as much. My discipline just flew out the window. This winter Todd and I were in Lancaster County and talked about how much fun we had riding in the Pedal To Preserve. So I came home and did what any normal sane person would do. I went home, searched it out and registered for the ride (actually I registered BOTH of us). I had grand plans. I was going to start riding as soon as the weather was nice and I was all set. We had GORGEOUS weather this late winter early spring. And I rode exactly 3 times...maybe 4. So now, I find myself 2.5 weeks from "Pedal" and low and behold I'm not ready. Todd is determined that he could push through with no training. Me....I'm not so sure, call me a wimp if you must. Sooooooo I am embarking upon a 2.5 week effort to be ready to ride. I only have to make it 20 miles. (I thought it was 25, but upon researching it a few minutes ago, I discovered it is a 20 mile ride).
When was the last time the Moocher spent any of her own money on anything. And especially in a Target Store where they don’t even carry sneakers that sell for $600.00, or Cristal Champagne and Beluga Caviar!
Approx. 15" high
The block of land is still for sale, we've only had one person express even a vague interest which quickly died out when we confirmed that we weren't going to drop the price to the level they desired. We have lowered the price to a last-resort level in the hope of getting rid of it, so the only other thing we can do at this stage is keep our fingers firmly crossed. Seems the real estate market is a bit stagnant at the moment. Hopefully we'll live through some mistakes to be able to learn from them :-P
I have met more than one other full-mortal, though, tempted across by Kate or by someone else. Lots of people fall for a full-mortal now and again, and want to show off. But the difference with Kate is that she has a nasty habit of, say, employing pipers and fiddlers for an evening’s entertainment, just when she knows the time’s going to warp. When they go back, they don’t survive longer than it takes to find out the date. She really is La Belle Dame Sans Merci. It’s cruel. Some Sithe think it’s funny; some don’t, but it’s damned difficult to say so to her face.
I just bought a CAC card reader and I use a Mac. I tried for about 30 minutes to get it to work last night and couldn’t solve the problem. I know it is possible to do and will take just an hour or two of getting the right information and patiently plugging away, but instantly I thought of buying a cheap Windows-based Netbook to be my “Army computer.” A $15 investment in a CAC card reader almost turned into a $350 investment in a new computer. The advice I would give to myself is to save my money and put in the work to just figure out how to get the CAC card reader to work with my Mac.
And if you can find a tread of anything linking these pictures today....
I was getting a quick dinner for the kids minutes before our babysitter arrived, when the phone rang. I answered it, but apparently I've lost my finely honed multi-tasking abilities, because I promptly grabbed the pan from the oven with both hands.
I talked Tani across the campus, though the park and down the big, stone steps where we reunited at last. “I don’t care if you’re mad at me,” he smiled, “I’m so happy I got to see this.” His eyes danced as he recalled the school’s square and admired the park’s sloping stonework. “Let’s come back here sometime,” he added. I kissed him and said, “I’m not mad at all, baby, I’m just glad I found you.”
Third, Gary and I started watching the DVD's of "Game of Thrones". And this show is just as good as the book was! Color me impressed!
and put them in their locker in between classes so no one sees me and they aren't embarrassed.
rules governing the behavior of money and markets) were impeccable.
This feeling of euphoria lasts until about the third week for me. I've diligently made bread a grand total of four times and then I begin to loathe the task. Excuses come up for why I can't make the bread. I don't want to dirty the kitchen. We don't need that much bread anyway. I don't have time to make it tonight. I'm too sleepy. And then the guilt of killing the starter or just dumping the whole jar out sets in.
But really, give a girl a helping hand and at least wear a t-shirt with a big, yellow smiley face. Or leave the black hat at home. Or trim your beard. Or carry a sign that says, "I am not a crook". Any of those small changes would be considered an act of community-mindedness, and would likely decrease the chances of you experiencing a false arrest sometime in your life.
- it was my first time at williamsburg music hall
At the cusp of what could have been stardom, Dyke was shot to death in Phoenix in 1971 in a possible drug deal. What a loss. But Dyke & the Blazers did leave a little something behind. Christian wrote "Funky Broadway," the jam later made famous by Wilson Pickett. Dyke's version ain't bad either.
And you wicked ones with your black and rotted
Have a blessed and creative day!!
Apologies for such a blatant plug, but I am so chuffed to be featured in a magazine as a writer and not just a disabled model. As someone who has been an avid reader of magazines for as long as I can remember, it feels like a great personal achievement.
She is just as culpable in the whole situation. She supported Nadya and the children. She had every right to dictate matters because they were living in her home and she was financially responsible for them.
But just not the other way round.
Busy as hell since it arrived here at Yahoo! Cars. Has an entire month already passed? It's hard to believe. In that time it's been at virtually every London airport as we escape the mitsubishi commercial vehicles a 107 and 141bhp 1.5 and 1.8-litre petrols plus a 138bhp 2.0-litre diesel, the mitsubishi commercial vehicle that have seen cars compete and win in the music mitsubishi commercial that runs between the Mitsubishi Colt DI-D comes across as a sizable load. Of course, something had to face up to that point partly thanks to some who expect supercar slaying performance on a limb here but I'd hazard a guess at never. There have been further removed from their fiery Evo cousins but the mitsubishi commercial song breathe in the mitsubishi commercial song, the mitsubishi commercial song be the 147bhp four-cylinder 1.5-litre turbo unit. The 1.1-litre unit and a viable option for those who have deeper pockets than most.
I am confident in my skills and the ones I will build. I am certain that I will be continually learning, educating, questioning, caring, experiencing waves of being disheartened and uplifted. I am content with the reality I face and knowing I can't save the world. I would like to spend some time making it a little bit better, though.
It was an opportunity to test the strength of the magnets, and none of my models came loose after 480 miles of driving, so that’s a good sign.
Luckily, we've already started doing some of things mentioned in the article, and other items are on the "to do" list for the future.
Perceived my way before my hair went gray!
The fact remains; in the absence of true humility, leaders don’t own the necessary “finesse” to develop greatness in others. Therefore, organizational effectiveness is diminished.
But, I know I CAN DO IT.
So lovely! Stop by tomorrow for a more in-depth look at this fab wedding as well as Julie's favorite part of her day and her advise to fellow brides! See you then ...
In June of 1967, original Creation singer Kenny Pickett left the group, to be replaced on lead vocals by former Creation bassist Bob Garner who was replaced on bass by Kim GarDner.
This is a game I inherited (the technical term is “stole”) from my parents as I would watch them play when I was a lad. I took this game to college, where, sadly, most of my scholarly compatriots were into the game of Hearts. I held on to this game in the hopes that I would find a worthy opponent. And I have…
In July last year, Tshwete announced the moratorium on releasing crime statistics and appointed a task team to gather and disseminate crime statistics.
Please join us in our photo projects. I've made a new page just for PhotoSunday! We had a very successful first attempt at photo sharing this Sunday. We spent a few minutes with each photo, offering each other constructive criticism. It was amazing to hear the children talk to each other and to us about our photos. This is going to be so much fun!
The unanimous Declaration of the thirteen united States of America,
Why was Lazarus Jesus’ GREATEST miracle? Jesus brought him back from the dead, right? We could argue that Jesus brought back the Jewish ruler’s twelve year old daughter from the dead too. What about her? Why would she not be an “equally” great miracle? Well, since we’re talkin about her now,…we’ll go to “her house” and take a closer look at her another time…back to laz…
I am devastated and concerned. Destin has admitted he is smoking weed again. I am sure that is the reason for his depression. Best case scenario he has switched to a depressed state of his bipolar and the marijuana is making it worse. What can I do? I want to lock him up and never let him out, but I know I can't do that. I am so torn up inside. I know what it feels like to be mentally ill and to not understand mood changes and to want to take something or use something that fixes it. He says smoking weed makes him feel "normal" when nothing else does. He says he is afraid of a med change. I don't know what more I can do for him. He sees a psychiatrist for his meds. He sees a therapist weekly. He has been seeing a substance abuse counselor and passed his last UA. I just had a feeling that he might have smoked so I asked him if he was going to pass his next UA and he told me no.
Death leaves a heartache no one can heal, love leaves a memory no one can steal.
Wasn’t alone neither. Had a woman with him. Film director. Wore her hair long and her smile wide, just as I like them.
Narrator taking in Elmer who is trying to climb the volcano with a rubber chicken in his hand. "But he's SUPER CUTE, Mary."
March came in pretty much like a lamb, with temperatures in the high 30s, sun and melting this afternoon. I have to qualify it though, because February was the real lamb. Almost all month, we had bare ground and mild temperatures into the 40s and 50s. Then, late in the month, we had three "snow events" (I can't call them snow storms - those were reserved for other areas of the state.)
Bestselling author Dannah Gresh empowers moms of with six proactive ways to raise sons age 8-12 to be honest, confident, and respectful. This encouraging, practical resource shows how the formative years can shape a godly, healthy teen and adult. Includes engaging activity ideas, and Scriptures to pray over sons.
Other items used: copics, watercolors, ribbon, twine, foam tape, PTI dies, Amuse impression plates, self-adhesive pearls, clear embossing powder, white embossing powder, nestabilities, glossy accents, homemade chocolate chip cookies, and the latest season of Psych on netflix.
Flavia de Luce: 2.5 stars, recommended for fans of child narrators and unusual detectives
Yet because we yelled and Jack's story was shared across the world - THEY HEARD.
Every Easter in our house is gluttonous, but this one was particularly so.
Because it matters. Because YOU matter. Because we are ALL 'enough'.
With that position of respect, there comes, within the legal system, certain protections. These vary state by state, so take what I outline here as a possible guidepost to what you may experience in another state. I live in Michigan, which in 1993 enacted a series of “tort reforms” whose purpose, ostensibly, was to reduce frivolous lawsuits. In order to reduce frivolousness (the actual problem of frivolous lawsuits was never actually established to be a problem), a Plaintiff filing a med mal suit would need to:
Take her for lunch or go to movies when you date your Thai girl. Don’t send her chocolate because Thai women are hot Asian girls and they don’t want to be overweight. Take every date with her seriously. When going out with her, dress neatly and be polite to everyone. Do not drink or smoke a lot. She hopes you are healthy.
Mahir Erkan, in the beginning of the speech, repeated the word of our lecturer Burak Buyukdemir about the way how to make a blog visited more and more. He said that you need to choose the theme and post the writings on the topic you like and you feel you are professional in it. By this way the rating of the blog will always rise and the results will be grateful. Hope I made it clear.
I was sleeping…. Ohh that was just a dream….
I DID breach boundaries…..
as it comes in the morn;
We crossed it out and they read it over again: it did, indeed, seem funnier. The word was more precise, communicating more of a sense of deliberate violence, which will hopefully stand in stronger and more comedic contrast to the polite, friendly tenor of the conversation. And it's a more flavourful word: "killing" starts strong but quickly becomes a slippery mush of l-sounds that mumble their way into "ing"; "murdering", by contrast, consists of three distinct syllables, the first two of which rhyme and are expelled forcefully outward: nothing soft, lilting, or indistinct about it.
I'm not feeling too into writing these days, but I thought I'd at least give you all an update.
Oxford is mentioned once, in discussing a location for a campaign ad:
HOLY MOTHER OF GOD, WHERE'S MY PENIS AT?
Hell: The state of being cut off from the presence of God. Not a place of literal fire and brimstone, though some have suggested that it consists of an eternal sacrament meeting with music by Janice Kapp Perry.
the questions now are of who and how – and what is meant to be
Tomorrow morning at COD (Crack "O" Dawn) I take off for my annual trip. I will be shooting with nine models in ten days. Three of those day will be spent with my Chicago model while we go to the Kinsey Show and then head to the canyons for some nude in landscape work. In the evenings we will work in the hotel rooms.
Words like “fudge ripple” and “sugar cookies” came floating out of my mouth like the most sublime Shakespeare. In my eloquence, I damned the toy to the seventh level of Hell from whence it came. No curse was more complete in its rendering.
Many insist that indie authors must write a series to be successful. The reasoning behind this is that a series of multiple books better establishes the author and makes him/her more visible to the public. However, I think that a blend of series and standalone books can best achieve this objective.
I bundled him up, brought a few toys, and headed to the porch. This boy had other plans!
To the left is a newer version of my Eureka and when mine gives up the ghost I will probably buy one like this. It has some newer features mine doesn't have. Like a special attachment for vertical cleaning without getting dust and dirt in your eyes; I like that idea!
This week's RemembeRed prompt: Congratulations! Your best selling memoir has just been optioned by a major motion picture studio, and the producers want you advising on the script. Write the opening scene for the movie. Would you begin with a visual montage? Voice-over? Flashback or forward? A conversation? The trick here is to look through a lens. The camera needs to tell the story through visuals, action, dialogue.
Have a great New Year!
Was it watching the photographers from 'Studio Harcourt' at work, taking their timeless and celebrated black and white shots? Was it watching the dog masseuses carrying on their dubious trade? Was it seeing the bold and the beautiful with their puppies-de-luxe?
The boy was named Santiago. But it is only in the first line of the book that it is mentioned so. In the rest of the story he is referred to as ‘the boy’. And what a boy he was. He took us through a mesmerizing journey to a treasure. He is a character from the famous author Paulo Coelho’s best selling novel ‘The Alchemist‘. He is in all of us.
Here’s the amazing thing.
With all of our items in tow, it was time to find out the overall damage! And yep, it was a little steep, but, we did get just about every single thing on the list, with the exception of some minor accessories, so we were pretty satisfied with the total cost:
Did you do it for money?
You are one of worth
“int” or “intermediate” routes spanning the V2-V4 range…
And I'm embarrassed by my complete lack of loving you over the years. The years. My shame perpetuates the cycle and keeps me inside. Inside my house. Inside my own life.
Send in the yahoos.
Laurie got hungry, and I was craving Panera since I haven’t been able to have it! So we went. She ordered the turkey artichoke panini. And I of course ordered a salad. I ordered the Meditteranean Salmon salad. I love this salad. Ever since it came out, whenever I go there I order this with a slice of whole grain bread on the side.
So, those have been some highlights of our recent weeks.
Metropolitan Barlaam of Rostov presided at the uncovering of St Job's relics in Staritsa. The Patriarch's incorrupt and fragrant relics became the source of healing for many who were afflicted by physical and mental illnesses.
That’s it. We’re using the KISS (Keep It Simple Stupid) theory. There won’t be any flashy lights, bells or whistles, just a simple plan to change as many lives as possible.
The name by the front door drew my attention to this otherwise ordinary house behind a picket fence in Darling Street, Balmain. Such an old name had me wondering about the history of the house. When was it built? Who had lived there? How did they make a living? How many families had been sheltered by these old walls? Who was Clarinda? A nice mystery.
7. Summon the spawn
Specifically, the TDI engine, AWD and hybrid system work together, recovering lost energy from braking and feeding the power back to the front wheels when accelerating. The 510 horsepower V6 TDI on the other hand sends its might to the rear wheels. The added weight of the hybrid powertrain is offset by a carbon-fiber gearbox housing, used for the first time in endurance racing.
Home offices should be a place unlike any other space in your home. The office should speak to your personal style, but it should also offer order, the opportunity for productivity and the feeling of calm (or excitement?) so that work can be accomplished. There should be ample storage and counter space, good lighting and proper seating.
3. Restore joint movement by breaking down scar tissue from old injuries.
When my daughter was a pre-schooler we loved Sesame Street and anything having to do with Big Bird. I'm not for sure who enjoyed the show more. One of our favorite movies was "Big Bird goes to China". There was a song from the movie that has stuck with me through the years. I've been singing it all week. (I hope I have all the spellings correct, and I'm sorry I am not able to show all the accent marks above the letters. I am sure they are in my computer somewhere.)
My job has downsides (I work long hours and sometimes get mistaken for a toilet) but it also has perks. Today’s perk was that I got a free (to me) manicure.
NOTE: Please remember to leave a comment on any post letting me know that you're emailing to me. I receive comments daily, and it will alert me to check yahoo for your email.
— Of course this post was saved as a draft for many days, and now I am back to finish it.
How do you 'accidentally' aim it at yourself?
Iraqi “emo” teens “stoned to death by the Moral Police” Initial report:three rockets launched from #Gaza into #israel -area of Ashdod. Breaking: 3 rockets fired from #Gaza to #Israel, #IronDome shot down 2 of them. 20 rockets fired today by now #terror Iron Dome system intercepted some of the rockets that were launched earlier at the Ashdod area.#defense
Incase someone just so happened
-My guilty pleasure is Jalapeno poppers.
BF: You don’t think they’ve tried?
Gregory: what do you think of Rush Limbaugh
After I'd fed her a few meals and felt I'd evened up the score of hospitality a bit, I let her take me to London for an all expenses paid birthday treat. Phew. Just in the nick of time as my confidence in my abilities and my creativity was waning. We walked and walked and I felt I earned a small amount of kudos by being the map reader and guide. Tamara has a keen interest in street art and seeing it through her eyes I became a huge fan too of this most optimistic of creative pursuits. The first piece we saw was this incredible and huge heron on the side of a wall in Bricklane It must have been 30 feet high and when we came around the corner it made me catch my breath and brought tears to my eyes. How on earth did they get it here?
Crystal/Rose swirl - Prima
Thank you for praying for Cain, and all the others still waiting for their families, esp in this cold (see my last post)! I REALLY appreciate it!! ♥♥♥ I feel bad asking you guys to pray and donate all the time, but there really is a NEED, and prayer changes things! Plus, I know you guys are awesome and won't let these sweet kiddos down! Thank you!! ♥
I suspect this year is going to be a doozie. Who knows what it will bring. All I know is it will bring change....to each of my children....to me too. Hold on people. We are in for quite the ride.
b) 10,000L cash prize
”Tom said some of his main tasks would be raising the standard of general maintenance, high rates and debt, land development, green waste dumping and the Emu Park boast ramp.
Yeah, we know that was 7, not 5...we considered posting them ALL!
This beer was brewed in celebration of the 135th Anniversary of Schell's several years ago. It was so popular, we re-introduced it under the name German Pale Ale.
One of the harshest criticisms of COICA is that it was too vague in it’s definitions of the type of websites that could be shut down by the Department of Justice. However, the definition of an “internet site dedicated to infringing activities” is still vague in Protect IP. Critics warn that this may lead to innocent websites being temporarily shut down erroneously until court proceedings can take place.
Kganyago confirmed that he knew of Aaron’s court action.
I must have had way to much to drink the other night. Apparently, I agreed to answer the question stated above. What would I do for $100? Give up beer.
I tried to decode the expiration date using Durkee’s FAQ page, but the number and letter sequence doesn’t make sense. Add that lack of information to the price tag still glued to the bottom – $1.67 – and I’m thinking I could have tossed this can of paprika 14 years ago and never missed it.
* Nokomis Callender as Cirque Freak
My sweet boy somehow managed to turn 3 without my permission. It was met with a great deal of mixed emotion. He was to start a new school district program on his actual birthday. This was finally our chance to move forward with him, and we had (and have) so many hopes for him. But before we jumped into those waters, we celebrated.
Here is some more information that I received from My Blog Spark on the BK/CROWNTM/MC program:
It has been a while since I posted how to crochet a project, so here it goes. Because it is the end of the school year, teachers and professors are grading everything in sight trying to get ready to submit grades. To show your appreciation, here is a simple amigurumi apple and worm. (Amigurumi World Seriously Cute Crochet By: Ana Paula Rimoli)
Two days before my due date, I woke up at 2am for my regular bathroom visit. As I hauled my bloated body across the bed I felt that telltale ‘pop’. Then I looked out the window and saw the snowflakes dancing against the dark sky.
The flags flung out from the steeples of churches and from all the
Now adhere your double-sided tape to the first 1/4" at both ends.
Next appointment on Thursday. :)
One officer died on the scene. The other officer - a female - was shot and critically injured. She was transported to JMH and died in surgery according to the Miami Herald.
Mr. Huckabee - It will be a cold day in hell before I ever refer to myself as being Catholic.
Then Africa, then Asia, then South America . . .
What's missing? Atlantic Yards.
There is another woman in the community, she just started 3 or 4 months ago. She shows up at nearly every practica, she asks for feedback, she tries to apply what is suggested and she is getting better every week. I have a feeling she will be a hit with the better dancers in Boston and everywhere else.
“I got Mr. Nod here. He’ll have you snoring as good as ever.”
“What a tart! He seems to have spent the whole night flitting from partner to partner,clearly not very big on LOYALTY! But why should that come as a surprise,his behaviour since he joined the BNP was a good foretaste of what these photos show,lots of smiles and running around behind people and then sticking it to them!”
* Removable fabric covers
The last thing I need is for the likes of you to come poking around these parts interfering with my view.
We receive your forgiveness.
Pours a cloudy yellow, with a fizzy almost white head.
Okay, here we go.
But my body will never be the same
on Tuesday afternoon (20/12) we actually fitted the door!
What should you be blogging about?
~Merlin the Tuna
And if she didn’t kill it? That meant something too. It meant she had to figure out how to improve in one or all of the above ways. How she went about it was up to her and her guild, but when the next tier was up for grabs as soon as they were ready to claim it, there was no incentive but to try to find a way there. This wasn’t even a state of failure—after all, there was always an upcoming boss yet to be killed (unless you were in a tiny minority). It was simply the order of things, and any given time, the goal was use what you had in term of gear and skills to take another step forward. The player described here was having a true gaming experience: each goal was attained whenever she found a way to reach it.
“No. Within the Forest lie dangers unimaginable. There are more than Wolves in there, Son.”
The nominations for the first Kraumur Awards were announced in November 2008. Nominations and the award winning albums are chosen by a selected panel of Icelandic music journalist and radio show hosts, with years of experience in playing and writing about Icelandic music.
The US and UK, or Greece). Other countries (eg. China or Germany) indulged them by lending enormous amounts. In the meantime, investors convinced themselves that the apparent economic growth fuelled by this debt was genuine rather than an artificial …
Stay beautiful (:
Alice In Chains - Dirty Toy Land
“Oh, yes He is.” This was in danger of turning into a panto.
027.024 YUSUFALI: "I found her and her people worshipping the sun besides Allah: Satan has made their deeds seem pleasing in their eyes, and has kept them away from the Path,- so they receive no guidance,-
Just think about it...
It was a joy-filled Tuesday! It makes a difference on where we put our focus.
Yes, it’s true that we have evolved in such a way that women become pregnant and bear children. And it’s also true that the loudest arguments against abortion are ones that stem from a patriarchy that is fostered both politically and through certain religions.
75 9th Ave (between 15th & 16th Street)
-a clean house
Let’s not kid ourselves, stories have minds and lives of their own. They are alive and they live on their terms. Some people’s stories may allow themselves to be captured and tamed into submission to reveal their inner depths. The stories that come to me don’t.
This blush is gorgeous! I reach for this when I don't want to look like I'm wearing a lot of makeup but I still want a glow. Its a very muted coral though, and doesn't have any shimmer. I love it though! My go to blush for summer!
So if you are a man or a woman, the law will be the same for both of you. Unfortunately, that’s not the case in India. And there is a good reason why this has happened, its because if one reads further in the article 15, which says the following:
But when I see their suit
Confetti Corn
Pears are tricky.
Moving away, getting married and – eventually – having children has reduced my available hours significantly. These days I get time to play once a month on a Sunday morning, but that’s about it. There’s no board-treading or occasional solo numbers or panicking and refusing to eat before the evening performance. I don’t have the energy to miss it, nor do I feel unfulfilled as a result, having found other ways to exploit my creative side. But I was looking through those old running orders and sketches quite recently, and feeling dangerously nostalgic. I still haven’t seen the video of Joseph, in which I made a rare appearance in front of the piano, rather than behind it. They asked me to play the title role, which involves quite a lot of reacting and less singing than you’d expect (given that the Narrator is the real star). I had to wear a ridiculous hospital gown, but it was nice to do something different and tread the boards, rather than spending the whole evening hearing them squeak above you.
So, I need to be smart about training for this race which meant that when last Friday, my training plan called for 4 miles nice and easy, I bailed because my knee was bothering me and I opted for a non-impact elliptical workout instead rounding out what should have been a 25 mile week with 21 miles.
* Lastly please DO NOT COMBINE YOUR ENTRY WITH ANY MORE THAN 20 OTHER CHALLENGES.
Do do do your dirty words
for me...
I know it has been awhile... too long in fact!
That's why this comes as no, as no surprise
I couldn't believe how much the baby has changed in the last two weeks. At eight weeks, the baby was somewhat of a blob. Our little bean. Now, our little one looks like a small teddy bear, all parts distinguishable. I laughed when I saw our baby move, throwing those little hands and legs up in the air! Avery wasn't that active at twelve weeks when we first saw her! This baby looks so healthy, so lively. I felt so much joy watching the little dances. It's so surreal that we have made a second life to cherish. It's so beautiful to witness life dancing inside of me.
Scoop ¼ cup of batter into each liner. Bake for 13-16 minutes or until a toothpick inserted into the center comes out clean. Let cool in pan for 3 minutes before removing to wire rack to cool completely. When cool, remove the paper liners if they were used before inserting into flower pots.
“Woah, Madison, I’ve never seen you like that!”
Your faculties serve you, and presently I must have them serve me.
I’ll admit it: these carrots are so good, they taste like candy. Maybe not Pop-Rocks or Starbursts, but my taste buds are slightly more discerning now, and my body a lot more in tune with what it really needs.
Yes, there have been protests, and the occasional voice raised in opposition. Osborne, most notably, together with the International Alliance for Women in Music, has led a long and valiant effort to bring attention to the situation.
2. Heart & Soul
To make our life easier we use random Org to help us pick our winners..
I don’t know its good or not for 1 month but I am happy and it feels great when you receive hits follower and likes notification.
Not Jimmy.
It was built slightly outside the village, on the edge of the forest and, more importantly, on the right bank of a stream which marks the eastern limit of Avensan: the Louise (visible above to the bottom left of the picture). The Louise later flows into the Jalle de Castelnau, which then passes through the Moulin de Tiquetorte en route to the Gironde Estuary.
Hello, my name is Jessica Pascarella! I am thrilled to be joining the Southern Girls Challenge! I live in Texas with my husband of 8 years, Michael. We have 3 awesome kiddos (Brayden-5, Daniel-4, and Adelynn-2). Being a stay-at-home, I lean on papercrafting to keep me from pulling out my hair. I give full credit to my grandmother for introducing my to cardmaking. She has been making her own cards since I was a teenager (I still have each one that she has sent). My main focus is
“Bigotry and judgment are the height of insecurity”
Oh, and everyone seemed happy that I decided to put aside Abe Lincoln Grows Up and read a new book (It’s Like This, Cat by Emily Neville–the Newberry Award winner from 1964). We talked a bit this morning about how we sometimes just don’t “feel” a book at the time we start to read it, and how that is okay because we may “feel” it at another date. So yeah, the changes appear to be ones that will be well-received.
Tomorrow we leave for Nashville and I'm so excited! I can't wait to check out the Grand Ole Opry and just mosey about in Nashville. It will be a great getaway for Hubby and I and the first time we are more than 15 minutes away from our kids overnight; and of course, they are both sick with coughs and colds. I am taking them to the doctor today, just to make sure they are all good before I leave.
I know I’ve blogged about this before and the info is available under the tag Publishing Contracts but what the heck, it bears repeating. I can add the link under the Agenting 101 headings now for easy access.
Sure enough, the car pulled all the way through about 5 feet in front of me without looking.
and loves and accepts you through it all.
So I held out, until I saw this beer. I am willing to try any beer and coffee concoction. But coffee beers, coffee porters specifically have not always met my expectations.
Here he is on the day he signed his
These senses of heavenly sense grow capable,
Now seeing as it was only one week ago we were flooding...
In 2008, cooperating producers used these same rates to plant soybeans at five sites with 20 replications. Planting dates ranged from April 29 to June 3. In the end, there was little difference in percentage stand and yield among the four planting rates. The 120,000, 150,000, and 180,000 yields were statistically the same (only a 0.3-bushel difference between the 120,000 and 150,000 rates) and were significantly better than the 90,000 seed-per-acre plots; however, note that the 90,000 plot yielded only 1.7 bu/ac less than 150,000 plot. All data was statistically analyzed to determine the yield differences due to the various treatments.
VII. The Blessings of Forgiveness and Feasting
In between running back and forth from the house to studio beneath the thundering sky, pouring rain, and avoiding falling hail, I added a lot of little fiber pieces to my quilt mosaic. Here you can see that the lines on the paper are clearly visible through the woven interfacing I used as backing and stabilizer.
She frowned. “No. That actually had not crossed my mind, Detective.” Heat was rising in her face.
I thought it best to start the blog now, a little ways out still, because once the baby comes, I’ll need to have things established and ready to go so I can just start sharing.
The oldest son was twenty-three.
Then, I started clicking on other commenters they had on their blogs. I figured if their commenters commented on their blogs, then they might be interesting too. I left comments. Good comments.
Well, good morning! Long time no see! We made it back Monday night from our trip to visit my husband's family and my daughter and I returned with a case of strep throat, so I'm feeling quite miserable- thankfully she got on antibiotics on Sunday and seems to be improving. I, however, just got on some antibiotics yesterday (stupid me thought I could beat it without them!) and, 24 hours later, feel no better. So hoping that changes.
The finale kicked off with hosts,
“Shake or become stiff”? Hello?!? That sounds very much like seizures to me.
Enter to win the What Women Want Giveaway below!
International reputation in tatters
collar, add some darts, I know usual for menswear, but it’s needed
I don't believe parents want their children to be the victim any more than they want them to be the bully.
Determining your writing style is only a part of the battle. You also need to pick a voice. Do you want to be informative, or do you maybe want to be more lighthearted and funny? Again, you need to look at who your audience is and what they are most likely to relate to.
Click for my original review:
Victoria is 11 months old and has lived at Eagles Nest since she was a couple of days old. Victoria was born without her left ear and only has a partial right. She has no ear canals so her hearing is limited to vibrations. Victoria also has cataracts in her eyes and at this point has only partial site. She was blessed to be able to go to the states the past couple of months on a medical visa and receive treatment for her eyes and an evaluation on her ears. What they discovered was that Victoria needed a special hearing aid device called the BAHA-- and if we were able to get it for her her hearing would improve drastically.
Natalia is too grief struck to answer. All she can think of is her grandfather. She remembers the book he carried in his coat pocket, Kipling’s The Jungle Book. He loved that book, and he loved the tiger Shere Kahn:
More drugs. I kind of suspected that the time she spent "detoxing" on my couch wasn't as miserable as she was claiming. I had a feeling that she was still high on something... After my, more thorough, search turned up drugs in her sons duffel bag, I became irate. She laid on that fucking couch for 4 days, treating me like shit, yelling about being miserable and being a basic pain in the ass. And I... let her get away with it, because I felt bad for her. When I really wanted to choke her. She all but blamed me for the way she felt. Trying to make me feel like shit. When in fact, we had not taken all of her drugs, and she knew it. I can't prove it, but I would bet a good amount of money that she was high the whole fucking time!!!
Then he trembled as the drugs coursed through his veins, took some deep breaths and went still.
And, without exaggeration, I stood completely still for several moments, mouth open and everything, flabbergasted by her self-absorption. Still not quite over the ridiculous comment, I explained that Grand Ma’s dying-husband situation was a bit different than Anne's situation, at which point she further underscored her mind-numbing selfishness by screaming, “So what!?!”
“The gun,” Johnny said, or trying to say, as he grabbed Sid’s shirt with his hand, the only part of his body that wasn’t bleeding. Sid nodded and tried to brush his hand away, but Johnny’s grip was strong. ‘Gun,’ he said, but it sounded more like ‘gum.’
and think that it's a four star restaurant.
I relayed all this to Chuck, who frowned. That was an awful lot of pajama time with my mother. But since he’d be on the road for most of it, he left it up to me.
The dogs are still tired after all their activity today which is good for me as they aren’t whining to go out. Isabel came out and ate some of their food so threw up gross stuff instead of her normal dry vomit. Ugh. I get so tired of cleaning up after the animals some times. Soon as the weather stays nice for a longer period of time, I’m going to cut Bennie’s hair way down because he sheds so badly. Isabel sheds a lot too despite brushing her.
And our time in Tampa...Next 4 are new too!
Sweet, yes?
Krane, S. Itagaki, Y. Nakanishi, K. Weldon, PJ. 2003. "Venom" of the slow loris: sequence similarity of prosimian skin gland protein and Fel d 1 cat allergen. Naturwissenschaften 90: 60-62.
April 30 marks eight years of wedded bliss for us! ;o) Yay! We celebrated last night by going to see Les Mis at the Fox. It was fabulous! We had wonderful seats, too--Row G, I believe, so seven back. Not as close as the time we saw the show in New York, but still close enough to see the performers' spit from time to time. LOL!
1 died
Electric down my neck
(And I realize I haven't posted much lately, but as usual, I'll try to be better. We've been busy lately. Not in an "OMG things are SO crazy!" kind of way. Just in the normal, busy family of five way. Life is good.)
“As our go-to-market strategy is to establish Titanium as the leading antivirus solution for the consumers, our marketing strategies have started to address both the channel and consumers for getting the brand share. We are soon launching our 30 city road shows across India for the channel partners. Again, as the Indian consumer is fast adapting the Tablets / Smartphone for net access, Trend Micro was the FIRST company to provide FREE Smartphone or Tablet security (Android, IOS, Windows & Symbian platform) with Titanium Maximum Security for consumers having multiple devices, apart from PC or Laptop,” said Rajat Sahu, Product Marketing manager, India and SAARC, Trend Micro.
The many stories and poems are of all different genre's. Over 500 pages of words to wallow in. Isn't that exciting?
10. Did I mention that my NKOTB DVD is on it's way? Cuz that REALLY makes me happy!
Eldest, middle and youngest
"There are few hours in life more agreeable than the hour dedicated to the ceremony known as afternoon tea."
Eventually it stops sounding ridiculous, like most words. (I think I once said ‘blogosphere’ with a straight face: a shame I may never overcome.)
"It doesn't matter. I've walked it plenty. I know it."
Publisher: Llewellyn
Triffids Goodbye little boy AUS
The winner has 48 hours to respond to the email or the prize will be given to another. The giveaway is open to anyone! Anywhere in the world!
And so I told the poem whilst the mum tapped – or in other words administered emotional freedom techniques (EFT) to her chid.
Fortunately, the video I made outside the conference (scroll down) quickly exposed his lies. Many of the students speaking to us were clearly anti-Zionists. BTW- the kids in the red t-shirts were the planners of the conference not just participants...
So who figured I couldn't really stay away? Although I am working hard on the new novel, of course I am still doing a few little sewing/quilting things and wanted to report in. Little, that is, like these hexies ...
Now on tap for a limited time is the latest batch of our Broadway Toddy Stout. This is our Oatmeal Stout that's been infused with a special 'toddy' coffee blend made exclusively for McCoy's from our friends at the Broadway Roasting Co. The toddy method of brewing is a cold-extraction, which reduces the coffee's bitterness by up to 70%, resulting in a highly concentrated coffee with tons of flavor and packed with caffeine.
Beat eggs and sugar 2 minutes.
3. Pin at least 8 images to your board – include your favourite reusables, your own waste free meals, and campaigns and people who inspire you to refuse, reduce, and reconsider!
Dick Clark's Primetime New Year's Rockin' Eve with Ryan Seacrest ... ABC ... 10 PM - 11 PM *NEW
“I can’t see it!” I said finally.
Let me give you a little personal example:
So I did what any self-respecting person in a crisis does: I cried for my mommy. I got back in the car and speed-dialed my mom, waking her up at 6AM her time in Arizona. "I have a crisis!" I explained. I broke down in tears. "I don't know what to do!" I had asked if I could drive back to my house on the flat tire. She advised me not to. But after we went through my possible options: "Do you have Triple A?" No. "Is there a gas station close?" Yes, but I don't have my cards or cash on me. "Do you know how to do it?" No, and it's freezing, and I'm wearing my pajamas and I have no gloves.
“I know that,” Zero retorted, “Michael is far too afraid of me to do anything. Would you have preferred it if I’d sent one of the degenerates that frequent the club to do the job instead?” Zero stared into Ramiel’s eyes, pleading for understanding, and finding little.
33. Hey, what are the chances of a guy like me, picking up a girl like you? +
08. Something Big
along this narrow way
I think Coach Fox gets the better of Michael Carvell in this discussion about the restrictions college coaches put on players who want to transfer, except for this one teeny, tiny point:
The success could also be used in eliminating social evils of female –infanticide as the girls who have won could become the role models of young girls and parents can be encouraged to support their girls. Saina Nehwal success story could be repeated again where a father goes out of his way to make his daughter a world champion and same goes for Krishna Poonia who also hails from Haryana though is married in Rajasthan. Her story is where the brothers and father supported and then her husband who helped get her to this level. Husbands can also take some heed where they can become facilitators in the success of their wives and will also be given due credit and their egos will also be not hurt in the process.
Cleaning the bathroom floor
87. Spaceboys ft. Earl Zinger & Valerie Etienne -
So, the key to releasing karma, is unconditional love. It is that which gives you ‘account access’. Which is why many people, regardless of how many charities they donate to, or how many abandoned puppies they find homes for, will not alter their karmic debt.
Besides getting used to devoting about 10 hours of my day to work (if you include commute time) I think what has been really throwing me off is reassessing my priorities. Since my break up from my five-year long relationship I (which happened about a year ago) I was completely happy being a single, free, independent woman. I’d still like to think I am. But now that I am back at a full-time job and living with a friend who is so adorably happy around her somewhat boyfriend (it’s complicated) it makes me have the urge to nest again. I miss coming home to someone who has been eager to see me all day (or vice versa) and making dinner together while we talk about the random things that happened that day. I miss the cuddles and pet names, and the look we gave each other when one of us mischievously pressed the “play next episode” button on the roku when we knew it was time to go to bed. Yeah, for a year now I thought those things were mundane and overrated. Now I’m not so sure and it’s messing with me. Didn’t I want to work on myself and make myself a better person before looking for someone to join me?
So, down into the bowels of the hotel we went... down until we reached the staff areas, where things are a little less than five star. The staff member showing me to the patient seemed surprised that she wasn’t where he’d left her. He was told that she’d ‘moved somewhere else’. This, of course, is a major feat for an unconscious person – Jesus being the only known historical exception to the rule of unconscious/dead equals’ inanimacy (I’m not entirely sure of this word but it sounds right).
Lifted up He defeated the grave
ONE of Britain’s most senior judges voiced his anger ­yesterday after hearing how a terrorist convicted of an ­airport bombing got thrown out of France but was able to find refuge here.
My best friend teases me with much candour, “You don’t like to be courted.”
Coffee break "If I have a rough night or morning with the baby, I stop for an iced mocha on my way to work. It's my treat for when things get stressful."— Tricia PaulsenGo soak yourself"I fill my home pedicure tub with hot water and sit in the bathroom and read, all alone. No one else is allowed in until I'm done."— Stacy Charlesbois, mother of Nathalie, 9 months, Farmington Hills, Mich.
Serve with meat, beans, eggs, seafood and vegetables.
14. Go-Go Train (Livin’ Blues) 4:58
Yesterday I met up with Abby and Kerri of Six Until Me, Briley of inDependence, Katie of 1LittlePrick, and Tina of @CollegeDiabetes. We began the night at Johnny Cupcakes (no carbs, no fat, no sugar!) and ended the night at Sweet (approximately 30g carbs, and 2 inches of sugar frosting). It was a great evening – we laughed, ate burgers and cupcakes, and scoffed at the outrageously priced T-shirts at Johnny’s.
You can take my word for it, that for men like me, a marriage after the type of Goethe’s would be the best of all—that is to say, a marriage with a good housekeeper! But even this idea is repellent to me. A young and cheerful daughter to whom I would be an object of reverence would be much more to the point.[6]
The Workouts:
Knight - A man-at-arms appears in the near future and serves the character for one month.
I called Richard to ask whether he could drive around, too. He said he would and suggested I go back home and wait in case Paul turned up and found the house empty, which I did. Richard drove around for a while but Paul was nowhere to be seen.
place an order for computerized system formats:
Gender: Who knows at this point... !! I've given up! 2 weeks & 2 days!!
Phase one of Plan A was simple recovery. Eating and sleeping and taking tests to see how my body was going to be after treatment, to get an idea how long it was going to take, how much energy I could expend each day, what tasks were possible, and how much they were going to cost the next day. Judging limits and building up as much as possible within those limits, then setting the goal posts a little further back. I gave myself until Easter, because Andrea was coming back then.
Hahaha… Oh yeah!
Oh did I tell you where the ginormous chalkboard wall is going? Here's a hint! Did you figure it out? Are you thinking "the dining room?? how weird!". I know it isn't typical but we just don't have room in our kitchen so the next best spot is the dining room. And I have to say that with one coat of chalkboard paint on (you'll see this soon, I promise!), I am loving it!!!
J.C is a cocktail waitress in a strip club
7. Being Persistent in Getting Help
I don't know what the future holds for Ben. I know that he contacted the museum where he has been volunteering and put in hundreds of hours working with trains, the big boys, the real things. They rented some cranes in order to move a couple of engines off flatcars onto track. Maybe it'd just me, but I think it's kinda cool!
1/2 an apple (green or red)
Even now, more than forty years later, I feel a little bit nostalgic about Joel’s one and only Christmas, a Christmas I can never return to. I enjoyed that Christmas, but I realize now that I didn’t enjoy it enough. One of the things I learned from Joel’s death is that life is so fragile that we ought to approach every day with the knowledge that its blessings may only be temporary, and they must be enjoyed as fully as possible.
Many moons ago, like maybe 4 or 500 or so, I got my Life and Business Coaching Certification and a business license and thought I was off to the races! Not so much... I wasn't completely done with full time mommying and quite honestly there are still days when I'm not quite sure. However, I have been stuck in the muck trying to get a website and blog going and linked up so that I had a place to point people and also could feel as though I am moving, even if I have no actual clients.
CNN posted an article today about the controversy surrounding Royal Caribbean's decision to resume sending cruise ships to their private resort on Haiti. Many are criticizing the company for the move, saying tourists shouldn't be enjoying the high-life while people continue to die nearby. The company has defended its decision saying that bringing tourism to the island contributes to the health of the economy. They also argue that diverting the ship to another destination wouldn't actually help anyone on the island.
3/4 t rubbed sage
Not a whole lot. These words you see here are actually the first words I’ve written in about a week. (This means if you received any email/messages from me you are either 1) very lucky because I haven’t done much of anything lately or 2) It’s not actually me it’s an evil doppelganger that somehow found out how to log on to my account.)
As is usually par for the course for UK films, you probably know everyone in the cast from another film—Michael Gambon, Maggie Smith, Fiona Shaw, and David Tennant, anyone? It’s almost an uncanny pre-Harry Potter gathering of actors, especially since they actually have scenes with one another. The heart of the film, however, lies with Keeley Hawes, who plays Lois. (I’d hesitate to call her the main character, however, since this is an ensemble piece.) She’s young, thoughtful, and, despite her beauty, at an awkward period between childhood and adulthood—boyish leggings cling to her, danger attracts her, she feels stifled as others plan her future for her. It would be so easy to play this as a flat, doe-eyed ingenue, but Hawes puts some emotional weight into it; Lois is trying to grow up peacefully in a situation that won’t let her. Further complicating matters is Anglo-Irish identity. Tennant’s earnest Gerald is constantly confused by how the Naylors so easily identify as Irish but still promote oppressing the Irish working class. Lois is described as a wild chieftainess by another character, but the freedom she seeks here will destroy her, as she explores a connection with a guerrilla fighter. Michael Gambon’s Lord Naylor is affable and patronizing, and Maggie Smith, as his Lady Naylor, is just so wonderfully natural.
I guess every dog deserves their day… or in this case, robin voiced by ex-pop-music-idol.
Heat up a wok with 1/2 cup of cooking oil.
“YOU can do it.”
No lime required; a lovely drop of lout. A delicate slightly sweet profile and nicely easily going. I enjoyed all of them. Not necessarily anything special, I’m not sure I’d have bothered had I not already had the glassware, but I’m chuffed to have got around to actually necking a brand of beer of an obscure glass I got given. I might even go get some more of it.
Some are stronger than others.
And closer to home:
So, are you into makeup? Not so much? I don't think I go overboard buying products, tending instead to stick to the tried and true (typically MAC eyeliners and brushes).
What's the next step? To sheet mulch properly. I borrowed my friend's truck again and am going to get more horse manure and mulch tomorrow. Then plant!
On a more serious note:
Post by Brand begins here:
Salt - per taste
"I want to have a party where all I play is Jungle Boogie on repeat for like four hours."
The Fourth Decade (31-40) by @ekwem
When your throat chakra is balanced you will be aware of more synchronicities in your life, things happening as you think them, as you are more tuned in to others. “…our way is made easier when we tune in to others.” Pg 141 It is very important when tuning in to others that you are aware of what is truly reflective of your own feelings. If we pick up on thoughts that are not to our benefit, it is important to assess rather than go along with the “collective” thinking and lose our power and that of our spirit. Pg 141.
﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿My prayer tonight is for all of the newly confirmed young people. In the words of Bishop Callahan, they are the future of the Church. It gives me great hope to see a cathedral filled with young Catholics and their families all renewing their faith in Christ and allowing the Father to shower His gifts upon all of His beloved children.
T – is for Toxic Relationships. An important key to managing your time is to manage who you spend time with and who gets to spend time with you. The people you are around have a dramatic effect on your attitude, energy, disposition, and motivation. You want positive, supportive and motivating people around you. If you’re spending time with people who don’t fit this description (Toxic), you need to kick them to the curb.
I will no longer let fear guide my decisions.
The practice of Haruspicy is common amongst African tribes. It is the practice of studying the entrails of a freshly sacrificed animal to tell the future – wealth, health and many cattle being the optimal reading. Of course, when it comes to Western society, all matters of the intestinal kind are barely discussed unless within the framework of a crude joke or when pressed by one’s gastroenterologist. Forget about looking into the toilet after the deed is done. All we want to do is flush.
The CDC was established in 1946 in Atlanta, Ga. Originally working to tackle malaria, the CDC is now involved in public health issues in the U.S. and worldwide.
Game 1 is in the books and favored the Predators 3-2, but Friday looms quickly and the Red Wings tempers are rising. Friday will prove to be a little more difficult for the Predators, even if they are at home. Detroit doesn’t want to get swept, and we doubt the will, but they also known that Nashville is clearly the favored team in this match up.
I am so excited to have my first Uni-free weekend in such a long time...so have lots of plans for sewing and finishing off the final touches on Bella's room :) What plans do you have for this weekend?
so now you’re done, your show is now over
Hotness is a consumable. A consumable that consumes as it is consumed but brings no warmth.
I tend to go back to old posts looking for comments and deleting junk. I've noticed that my posts can go on and on. At the risk of being too wordy today, and because I want to read Stewart O'Nan's The Odds this afternoon, so that I can send it along to the next person on the wait list, I'm going to talk about Zane's presentation tomorrow. She was a knockout and I'm so sorry that more people weren't there to hear her.
Before I tell a couple stories from work, I have to explain that in medicine, D/C means discontinue. So when a doctor writes "d/c heparin", it means "stop administering the medication heparin from now on." OK, now that's defined.
Now for Miss Maya's. Maya LOVES Lalaloopsy dolls!!!! So here is her creation. She had been watching me scrap the day before and she really had wanted to do misting. But we tried and it was too hard for her to push down the nozzle and hold at the same time! She ended up wearing it at one stage!! So she then wanted to paint! So i showed her the hearts and she immediately wanted to paint them. I also gave her my washi tapes ( I know....so generous of me considering they are my addiction!!) and showed her how they work. She loved them and found them so easy to use! She was so precise in what she wanted to do!!!! And she used a handmade embellie too....one of my mums crochet flowers!!!
I mean what I say, I’m honest,
So what is truly needed is something rare and expensive which can replace shark fin, something which carries prestige. High end Bordeaux wine, such as First Growths, or some other equally expensive wine, can fit that qualification. We all know how Bordeaux wine has taken China by storm, and that expensive Bordeaux has found a great market in China. That type of wine fits within their cultural desire to display their prestige and wealth, to give to friends and business associates an expensive gift. Bordeaux can easily be more expensive than shark fins, so it offers an even greater symbol of wealth. At weddings, great banquets and other such significant events, serving costly Bordeaux can speak far more loudly than any soup.
Rustic & Refined Napa Dream Home! Architectural Digest describes this designer home "The elegant stucco, wood, and stone residence has three pavilions that are joined by covered breezeways. Wherever possible, the buildings are one room deep to maximize the natural daylight and views. The main structure comprises the central living/dining salon, the kitchen and sun room to its southeast, and the library, master suite, and a guest suite to the west. Each of the two ancillary pavilions contains a garage on the main level. Above one is an office/studio and bath, and below it are a media room and a wine cellar. The other is topped with a two-bedroom suite for visiting friends and family." I think this home is absolutely amazing. I have always been drawn to European inspired designs with inter-locking coridoors and a strong connection between the outside and the interiors.
Have a good week lovelies.
Had Paul gone into such detail he would have lost the Jews for they only knew of the law in which they took pride. That may be the reason many today do not see the difference for they know Jesus Christ physically and not spiritually. I also gain this insight by reading our newspapers. Religious leaders are treating Christianity as a science. Thus the church is compared to all the clubs and organizations of the world. Remember that the Church, the Body of Christ is not an organization, but a spiritual organism.
54 as of right now!
So far it has been a blast picking out what part of my fluff stash goes along! AND as an added bonus, we get to show off all those adorable prints (made by none other than muah!)because we won't be needing a cover most of the time!
have outlined the sentiment with Copic C1 and lightly touched music with Copic E11.Added clear glitter - this is one of those cards that's so much prettier in your hands...I cant get shiny pics photographed well (-:
But we see Jesus, who was made a little lower than the angels for the suffering of death, crowned with glory and honour; that he by the grace of God should taste death for every man. Hebrews 2:9 (KJV)
States are constitutionally required to recognize magisterial acts (the mundane legal administrative activities) of other states, i.e. a New Mexico driver license is good in Massachusetts and Minnesota, Alabama and Alaska. A court judgment from Oklahoma can be enforced in New Hampshire. A County Clerk’s certificate from Texas is acceptable in Utah.
That's one argument Gary and I have had since before we were married. Neither one of us wants to be the one left behind. And I would say that it would be lucky for us to go at the same time, but that would really hurt our daughter, so I cannot wish for that to happen, either. Well, maybe a vampire will bite both of us and we'll live together forevermore. Hmmmmm.....nah.
OCTOBER 2007 AND JANUARY 2008: 33 VICTIMS AGED 12 TO 15
When Jesus was dying, He hung helpless upon the tree. He entrusted Himself into the hands of His Father. “Father, into Your hands I commit My spirit” (Lukas 23:46).
That is like no other.
Let me continue the lists of my best recommendations and favorites of the past year, 2011. Last week, I provided a list of my Favorite Restaurants of 2011 and now I want to address my favorites for other Food-Related Items, from markets to books, from ingredients to bakeries. This is certainly not a complete list but it is more a sampling of memorable matters I have experienced and posted about over the past year.
In a second experiment, Ramachandran et al tested TK and 15 control subjects on a Stroop interference test.
(3) I would actually trace it back even earlier than that, maybe even to the 1920s in the U.S. and as early as the 1890s in Germany, but the evidence is scarse for such an assertion.
What happens is I now focus on the dinner table being a joyful place to be. Not necessarily a gourmet place to EAT. There is a BIG difference.
I dedicate this post to Rebecca Dickinson who nominated me for the Kreativ Blogger Award. Please visit her blog, “A Word or More,” here.
Lo Mein, Chow Fun, Moo Shoo, General Tso, Fried Rice, Hot and Sour Soup, spring rolls...Ahhh! I love the Americanized Chinese fast food! Sweet and savory sauces over crisp vegetables - I get hungry just thinking about it.
If you live North of a line from Birmingham to the Wash in the UK - keep well wrapped-up today.
If I want a Old School Western? Clint Eastwood. But if I want a comedy? Clint might not be the right actor, unless Clint wants to branch out and do some intensive study in the area of comedy. With a lot of work and training, Clint could pull it off. But does he really want to? Does the director want to mess with it when it is simply easier to cast Jack Black?
Acts 16:6-10 – Paul’s vision of the man of macedonia
Titus is still rocking on all fours. He's been doing it for about 2 weeks and I just know he's going to take off at any moment. Life, as we know it will completely change.
Basically, this missing child was not being looked for by anyone. The grandparents weren’t aware of what had taken place. Casey Anthony had stolen her mothers credit card and ran up charges, she had practically burned bridges with a lot of people.
I would have liked to see the pronoun “we” changed to “I” throughout the letter since the May 21 date for the apocalypse was Camping’s baby. Nevertheless, while I have significant points of theological disagreements with Harold Camping and Family Radio, I commend him for his humility. We ALL, every one of us, know how hard it is to say “I was wrong.” In any case, the whole May 21, 2011 fiasco is a hit-you-between-the-eyes illustration that we must not be consumed with end-time date-setting. The Father has fixed the time of His Son’s return to establish His kingdom and it is not for us to know, period. In the meantime, we must be witnesses to the risen Christ while still exclaiming, “Maranatha!”
Any surprises along the way?
The government should strongly recommend that food companies and supermarkets use a consistent food labelling scheme that includes traffic light colours. They all have a responsibility to provide a system that helps shoppers compare products, and then easily pick the healthiest option if they want to."
As soon as we arrived I was overwhelmed with my Nani (Mummy’s mother) and Dadi’s (dad’s mother) cheek pinches, warm hugs, and delicious Indian foods. And while I seemed to be drowning in all of this affection, before I knew it, Mummy was in the hospital. Today I understand that my sister was born a full month prematurely, as there were problems concerning Mummy’s glucose level due to the gestational diabetes. Anyway, I’m going to refrain getting all medical-y in this post, since it’s about something entirely different, but I vaguely remember not being allowed to visit Mummy for two days because she was “very very sick.” Those two days were miserable. Suddenly all the hype about meeting my baby-sister was overshadowed by my mother being in critical condition. In addition to the temper tantrums, rejection of food, and breaking out of stress hives, apparently I had developed a great angst for Nimisha, who was not the healthiest baby at the time. I blamed Mummy’s being ill on my sugar-high sister. Kind of deep for a five-year-old, no? I tend to think so. But apparently that’s what happened.
Gordon augmented those visits with a trip to Historic Deerfield, where the hearth cooking experts taught him how to bake bread like the woman would have. He also delved into the world of re-enactors, interviewing someone in that world and spending a lot of time on their posting boards online, finding out their concerns on the job, the sorts of things that would affect his modern woman character.
The first mile felt good and I cruised past the marker at 8:42. A little faster than I had originally wanted but not too bad.
We have a campfire in the backyard under the big Douglas Firs. Campfires always mean hotdogs and marshmallows too. Alyssa made a giant vat of potato salad and dessert included banana cream pie leftover from the baking week because it was graded too low (by me) to be presented to a bridal couple. So sad. (Not.)
Your glacial intellect, which birthed the first
49.Bright red lipstick. Ladies, if you want to make a professional impression in business, save your bright red lipstick for your night on the town and opt for a more muted shade instead.
A short 2 minute film narrated by Dame Judy Dench with Daniel Craig as James Bond 007 starting off as the usual well-dressed spy who then goes and dresses the part of a woman. The figures read out by Judy Dench bring the horrible reality of how badly women of this earth are treated. Even here, Canada, USA, Europe, countries who claim to be civilized, yet there are women every day who are killed, maimed, raped, abused and die at the hands of their husbands, boy friends, and ex's.
32 back
I understand the position these people have over the topic, but where do we get that standing against same sex marriage is against the teaching of Christ? His teachings stated what marriage was, so there is not a lot of support from his sayings on this matter. When you look at the matter of trying to be loving, supportive, or nurturing, I am lost on if these actions are to be directed towards the person or a civil status. Christ never once taught on these things did he? Be supportive of a person’s choice to marry? Yes, we are to be loving towards a person, but not their actions.
issue of our time: Should Government get its
Only five bucks, and it’s going to look great in our guest room -- when it’s done. Someday. In about ten years. Or so. Around there.
Please email Kath and you will soon by playing with those gorgeous ribbons and PB sentiment stamp! And don't forget to nab the winners blinkie for your blog!
but no heat in the cold
I gaped transfixed at the transformation of a city I had spent so much time in as a young person, first enjoying the subway, Honest Ed’s and the Kensington market as a child, then enjoying the sometimes granular nature of the waterfront, the nightlife as a young oppotunistic adult. I wondered where the preservation of what used to be had gone, and if anyone was bothering to think about it as trucks and cranes moved ever forward to cover yet another hole in the ground. Long gone were the squat warehouses and red brick factories, the rectangular billboards, the mixture of different building colours and design jumbled together, all bright colours and shapes mixing to form a type of visual music.
reaching towards the bones
I have 2 rooms with old linoleum that are going to need updating at soon point...
Long term the most important aspect of a business is not how big it has become, but how profitable it is. In that regard Amazon is the odd one out. Their operating income last quarter was about 1% of revenue. Amazon needs to move $100 worth of goods to earn $1. They employ 65,000 people and had revenue of $13.2b last quarter, yet only earned $130m during that time! Apple earns more money just with their iPad covers! Amazon’s strategy is to subsidize the initial Kindle Fire sale and hoping to make money on the additional purchases over the lifetime of the product. In light of these numbers, do you think Amazon has a future with it’s Kindle Fire tablet against the iPad?
On Friday we took the kids to Lansing to Impression 5, I went there in middle school and remembered it being a super awesome place. It is advertised as a science center and I just knew that David and Ryan would love it.
If you are interested in any of them just click on the job titles and it will take you to the job description.
Once again, with another Demon Squad book comes noticeable improvements in every aspect of the book. The plotting is tighter, the dialog sharper, the characters continue to develop, and the world building is greatly improved. Marquitz is a writer that is improving in leaps and bounds with each novel he turns out, and it is nice to see such developments play out on the page, to the benefit of both the novel itself and the reader's enjoyment.
1 ((number 10) can crushed tomatoes
From Associated Press article:
Merrell: You got some?
So overwhelmed with love and gratitude from the Surprise Birthday Weekend I'm a giddy emotional and physical wreck from the bourbon-infused bacchanalia. More about that later, but right now, this:
After a few days enjoying really great food and sight seeing in Arequipa, we made our way towards Arica, excited to see if our sprockets would be waiting for us.
"It benefits the people in power, but what about the poor? BEE is more of a problem than a solution."
Days like today I get frustrated and even feel pretty low but staying in the state does not help. Become more invigorated and stronger in resolve is whats needed and I can't forget the importance of recovering for illness. We now have 3 weeks until the first round of National trials. Today we fell over. Now its about getting back up and re-establishing momentum.
We kissed like a pair of teenagers in the front seat of my car for hours. We would stop kissing, he would put my face between his hands and then we’d kiss some more. At one point around 3am, he suddenly turned the music up, opened all the windows, got out of the car and came around to my door and tugged me out of the car. He wrapped his arms around me and we stood under the moonlight dancing. I don’t think my feet were actually touching the ground at this point. It was one of the most incredibly romantic things I had experienced in a really long time and I just wanted to stop time. I wanted to remember every detail of the way he smiled down at me, the way his arms felt around my waist, and how we seemed to fit so well together. My lips were sore when we finally stopped at six am and I felt as though I had been hit by a freight train, if it’s possible to feel really really good after being hit by a train.
“We’re looking at a group of people that has steadily declined over the past five years, and it looks to decline next year,” said Dick. “It’s tough for people to look at that.”
The problem I see with Ms. Evans article is that she tends to put what she identifies as “cool” church in an ugly box. In other words, she paints an ugly picture of cool church and then says in essence, “Look how ugly that picture is!” For you philosophical types…it’s a straw man argument (i.e. a false argument – you can go deeper…Google it). That said, each style of church faces many of the same dangers…cool, uncool, contemporary, traditional, etc. For me, it’s not about cool or not cool. It’s about faithful or unfaithful. I love that we have multiple versions of worship. Each worship service in the church, regardless of worship style,s seeking to be faithful to following Christ.
Street magic performer. Award-winning ice sculptor. Hog-calling champion. Boogeyman assassin. These are all things Tara Lazar (your interviewer) has never been. Instead she prefers writing picture books.
Micajah Autry one of the martyrs of the Alamo has a memorial shaft here. He perished during the days between Feb 23, and March 6, 1836 when 150 revolutionist were killed at the Alamo Mission in the Texas War of Independence.
With top judges Sir Tom Jones, will.i.am, Danny O’Donoghue, and Jessie J, there is no denying the abundance of talent in this show in which the contestants are only judged on their voice before the judges select them for the second battle stage.
I choose to plan for tomorrow but live for today to God’s glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
Happy 4th of July everyone!!!
It happens at school, at home, in organized sports, in places of worship, at holidays, and even in the mass media. As a matter of routine, our culture enforces the concept that in order to be successful, you must not only follow the rules, you must sacrifice your dreams and set lofty goals for yourself so that you can achieve goals which are often set by others. People who dream, and fail to achieve the goals set for them by the variety of established authorities they come into contact with, are viewed as having their heads in the clouds. Unless and until they conform, they are often ostracized by their teachers, parents, and others. And like Pavlov's dogs they recognize early that dreams are punished, and goals are rewarded, often whether they are achieved or not - and regardless of who set them in the first place.
Frankie is finally home, took her 3 weeks to get here… drove me slightly insane, but hey! Worth it! She’s beautiful and cute, and her chubby little face could not be more adorable. Or at least that’s my opinion. I think hers and Draculaura’s are the cutest faces, the rest have something very posh and sophisticated about them.
- 2 tablespoons (30 ml) (15 gm) (½ oz) Basic Creole Spices (recipe follows), or store-bought Creole spice blend
Recently, I read an article on the NPR.org about Teresa MacBain, a former Florida minister who no longer believes in God. (Click here for a link to the article). In a nutshell, MacBain, the daughter of a pastor, had been raised in a conservative Southern Baptist family and eventually became a pastor in the United Methodist Church. However, after questioning her faith she decided to profess herself to be an atheist. So, she came out publicly at the American Atheists convention in Bethesda, Maryland. As anyone might expect, the fallout resulted in the loss of her “job” and some very public backlash against her.
I don't know how she did it but all day long there were crowds of people
All this you do without complaint, without expecting anything back, and always with a smile on your face. You truly are a carer in every sense of the word.
If you can refer to the sheet you may have, on the back there’s something called a Kadisha Tome Demonis Kaddish. And this is the larger ideal of drawing connection between worlds, our own worlds and the worlds, again, far beyond us. You’ll see the Aramaic at the top and the transliteration of it at the bottom. We’ll go nice and slowly, for us to hear these words. It is a linkage, it is a connection from our soul, one, each to each, one to another. And we hope, too, that as we find and make sense and bring ourselves from step to step in this world, that John, too, is doing the same in a world beyond.
Taking the steps to stop smoking will help you age gracefully since smoking can worsen the facial features that are tied to aging. Many smokers have wrinkles that form by their mouths, negatively affecting how young they appear. Quit smoking now and you should notice a difference after a few weeks.
equipment, the quantity and quality
In another case, a senior manager in the Department of Arts and Culture issued a R287000 grant to stage a music festival. The money went to a close corporation in which he held 50%.
A March Washington Post poll showed that Democrats were more willing to change their views about a subject to make their team look good. For example, in 2006, 73 percent of Democrats said the GOP-controlled White House could lower gas prices, but that number fell by more than half to 33 percent in 2012 once a Democrat was in the White House.
In her quest to seek an injunction against the Dallas headquartered carrier, Tiggeman alleges that Southwest ignored her ‘constitutional rights’ and is involved in ‘discriminatory actions towards obese customers’
A former presenter of One Man and His Dog has been arrested on suspicion of inciting racial hatred in a pro-hunting speech.
Today’s memorial was worthy of an artist. It began with us all making book covers for a memorial scrapbook. Many of Barbara’s papers were available for decorating/ collaging the covers— marbled papers, monoprints, and watercolors she had created at Artists Bookworks, Columbia College, Ragdale, and Oxbow. After the covers were completed, students at the school helped with drilling holes and gold leaf stamping. One of Barbara’s sons had printed images of Barbara’s life, which served as the contents of the scrapbook.
At other times Venus passes below or above the Sun because the two orbits are at a slight angle to each other. Transits occur in pairs separated by eight years, with the gap between pairs of transits alternating between 105.5 and 121.5 years. The last transit was in 2004.
Of course we should educate them about STD’s and the way they can ruin a life, or at least make life painful. Then give them a handful of condoms and say be careful and HAVE FUN!!
It’s been an interesting journey so far… Nearly 2 weeks in, and I feel great. I am certainly learning a lot and am looking forward to reading/learning even more! I welcome your feedback, questions, and comments!
But at the same time, the number of people living in poverty has changed little since apartheid ended, with no remedy in sight given the structural problems in education.
brushing aside your credentials.
When he was asked how much he had had to drink he replied to the effect that he had been camping at Silverstone, ready for the GP. His family and friends had a barbeque on the previous night and everyone had been drinking all day and most of the night. He finished drinking around 4am before going to bed. He got up about 7.30/8am to find a store to get some supplies and feeling ‘fine’ he jumped in his car to forage for his bread and milk. The result of his actions meant that he missed the Grand Prix, lost his his driving licence, was given a heavy fine and a 12 month disqualification, and his £200 ticket for the race.
“Go ye,” He said to them, in this pretended apparition, “and teach all nations, and be assured that I am with you always, even unto the end of the world.” Luke contradicts himself upon the subject; for in his Gospel he says that it was in Bethany where He ascended to heaven in the presence of His apostles, and in his Acts of the Apostles (supposing him to have been the author) he says that it was upon the Mount of Olives.
Well I have not completely fallen off the face of the earth. The past several weeks I have been doing some cardio, but have mentally been trying to get through alot. One of which was breaking down and weighing myself. I did it, it was terrible. Now I will work it off.
Oil for deep frying
35. Ceremony: Leslie Marmon Silko
Yes, many of the female characters listed above are flawed, or even downright awful people. But that’s the point: there are so many female characters that they don’t all have to be the sole standard-bearer of female existence in this story. Not a single one of them fits into an archetype mold, and all of them are individual people, with their own stories and motivations. Any woman or girl of any type is going to find a character in this story she can identify with.
Tax-free deductible savings account,
They move to the next kennel, giving each of us cheer…
My mouth was sticky and hot, and I could talk to save my teeth.
That being said the ‘?’ following PostDeleuze is meant to be as uncertain as it seems if not a little provacative because of the way Deleuze is used as an odd metaphysical (but perhaps not purely metaphysical) backdrop for quite a bit of work done in New Materialisms and Posthumanism. As I mentioned in my last post, Cyberfeminism occupies a sort of forgotten place inbetween these bodies of theory and takes on another interesting twist given Sadie Plant and Luciana Parisi as part of the CCRU (Speculative Realism’s prehistory).
Halloween 2009
And what said the gallant?
Speaking of Wile E. Coyote, where did the Times Square bomber get his materials? Acme? And what is it about NYC that attracts these wouldbe "terrorists" who seem to take their cues from Woody Allen movies? A tee shirt vendor saw smoke coming out of the vents of a Nissan Pathfinder van late last Saturday night. When the NYPD bomb squad got there, this is what they found:
This is a recurring theme with Alabama linemen, it seems. Remember that last year, Andre Smith showed up sporting his fat-ass costume at the NFL Combine (and he only weighed 332), and was so unprepared that he left the combine early. At the Alabama Pro-day, he had dropped some weight but was still considered overweight, and slow. He might have been the 1st OT taken off the board (as high as 1st or 2nd overall) had he shown up looking fit, and he was expected to drop much further than he actually did (6th to the Cincinnati Bengals).
I think it’s important to give him mention because his generosity builds the foundation of the tree’s purpose: to offer people an opportunity to immediately experience giving nurturing energy to the planet and receiving life-sustaining energy in return.
Here, for example, is what just the New York Pension system holds:
Came home for 11am .. which means I was in college for little over 45 minutes .. new record I think. Sat down on my car chair, which I am absolutely loving .. I’ve said it once and I’ll say it again .. best £25 I’ve ever spent .. ever. I get so much work done sat here it’s unreal .. and it’s dead comfy .. feet up, typing for hours .. quality.
So between Multnomah and Spring As Spun I’m now up to three shawls this year. Considering we’re nearing the end of the fourth month I am a little behind. My next shawls will both be for my children’s teachers. I just need to decide what they might like – colour-wise, especially – and what yarn I have in my stash to sufficient quantities. One teacher likes green, apparently – DD asked her straight-out what her favourite colour was and then pretended she was doing a survey of how many people in the class liked green. MC advises his teacher wears the colours of France, which I take to mean the French Flag. All I have gathered is that her coat is black and that she has, on occaision worn a red hat or a blue hat.
2) I'm a TV head.
But before I do that, a word about what hypnosis is, is not—and why these words are considered hypnotic.
14 - Roky Erickson & the Aliens - White Faces
To celebrate with friends,
Beat the shortening and margarine together until well combined and fluffy. Add the sugar and beat until fully incorporated. Add extracts and soy creamer, and beat until smooth (5-7 minutes). Tint with food colorings and use to decorate.
while you create a full suite of wedding samples —
Before I leave you with this delicious curry, a note of caution: don’t use sweetened Thai canned milk available in stores, for this preparation. Ideally go for Indian or Sri Lankan products that are not so sweet. The curry is a bit on the spicier side. If you prefer it milder, omit the green chilies and add more coconut milk to adjust
So starting today and continuing through the next three Wednesdays, you can watch the final four “Two-Minute Warnings” Chuck recorded — all at ColsonCenter.org.
I counter sunk the fixing holes to make sure that the fixing bolts wouldn't get in the way of what ever I was trying to sand, I used a Forstner bit to make the counter sinks, I made the holes big enough to fit the washers in as well.
4-5 cups hot chicken or vegetable stock
Shortly before I left, I asked him, “Do you ever dream of flying?”
After Rob got home from work on Tuesday, I would take the New York Water Taxi’s Statue by Night Cruise. It leaves at 7:45pm and arrives back 1.5 hours later. From there, head uptown, to view the city from Top of the Rock. I loved the idea of seeing the city from completely different perspectives in one night. After that, I would check into The Manhattan Times Square Hotel. It's located only a few blocks away from Rockefeller Center so it felt super convenient. Then, I would relax, sleep in, and do NOTHING until I had to pick up my kids from school at 2pm the next day!
- Mini Thai salmon fish cakes with chilli lime dipping sauce
Another no-go was non-natural coloured hair. Only Cosplay-Lolitas were wearing pink wigs. I remember that I felt very weird when I wore my pink wig with a Lolita co-ordinate for the first time. Also, I felt the need to justify my decision to wear a pink wig. Then the OTT-Lolita-movement came along and at the moment it seems like the trend goes back from pastel coloured wigs to natural coloured wigs.
If it's true this December, I certainly can't tell yet. We close next week but we are working like there is no holiday around the corner. Sara just wrapped up a deal earlier in the week. I'm announcing on Pub Lunch a deal I closed recently. I'm in the middle of two other negotiations--one of which was out of the blue from a publisher who couldn't offer earlier in the year but now is.
6) The Spirit of Christ was in the Old Testament prophets and testified beforehand the sufferings of the LORD Jesus Christ, and the glory that should follow. 1 Peter 1:11. In Genesis 3:14-16, BEFORE the Old Testament existed, Christ was to be the Seed of the woman; in Malachi 3, “the LORD Whom ye seek.” In Isaiah 7:14, Christ was to be the LORD AND the Seed of the woman. Fascinating stuff!
Some Stoke fans are getting restless with our performances of late and given the lack of new signings in the January transfer window this doesn’t help either. But we they seem to forget are mid-table, in the Europa League knock out stages and the last sixteen of the FA Cup. Yes our play can be a bit one dimensional at time but we have to play to our strengths and getting another season of Premiership football is always the goal. I do think Delap needs dropping though as Palacios adds more calm into the midfield or even Whitehead who puts in a good shift. Onwards and upwards! Fulham away next…
The warm shock of menstrual blood, and all your
So so sorry but if you live in Texas the only thing I can do for you is give you a project quote.
"He considered them close friends and this got to him," said Daou.
Deana Hager I really want to get a computer with enough memory, speed etc to do digital art. I graduated from college in 1983 with a degree in Graphic Art. Everything I learned or did during that time was "old school" meaning it was all done by hand. I LOVE the computer and really want to do a lot more in the way of digital.
I'm almost ready.
So to you PNP, may we see an end to your blunders soon. Do train hard, you obviously need it.
The best thing to do, if they are at all interested, is encourage people to read Financial Tyranny as a starting-point.
And next is a layout I created with the new and gorgeous Charlotte's Dream Collection! The family photo was taken at the Grande Floridian Resort in Orlando, FL this past December while vacationing there. We were dressed to celebrate our 25th wedding anniversary and had the most amazing dinner and evening shared together!!
The emerging church is earth-minded and mocks a heavenly-minded orientation. Typically, it gets more excited about solving the “AIDS crisis” and saving polar bears than winning lost souls.
And how close did we come to electing an environmental charlatan called Al Gore? Or John Kerry whose choice for vice president, John Edwards, is currently in court charged with using campaign funds as a “gift” to his mistress and his illegitimate child, the result of an affair carried on while his wife was dying of cancer?
First, there was a little presentation of all the products. After that, a lot of testing, and browsing through all those new products.
Fads and styles that won’t last long: cropped cardigans (or cropped anything), wedge boots, boho handbags, graphic tees.
After his speech he explained that the song had been used as early as the 1960s to express in song the ANC's loyalty to the late Albert Luthuli, an ANC icon and former leader of the party.
I had a swim on the agenda today, and after figuring out a nice, easy workout to get me started, I headed over to the pool. If you recall from last time, I had issues with the lanes not being set up and the pool full of people not lane swimming. But this time, I thought, I was prepared. There was ONLY lane swim available at this time, no family swim, no leisure swim. So to the pool I went.
Deirdra: What was the pathway like for you to get your first book published?
Unfortunately, Matthew was the victim of abuse in his family. Therefore, he proceeded to abuse Sally, beating her badly after their sexual encounters. Because Matthew was also a mentally challenged individual and Sally refused to press charges against the man she loved, Matthew was never arrested or paid any price for his brutal beatings.
-SALT AND PEPPER TO TASTE
Well, I forgot that it starts getting dark around 5:30 these days...and we had just left Grandma's house. I thought it might be too late, and I would have to say "sais la vie" to the cotton idea, it may be too dark. But as I rounded the corner, I jerked the car into the cotton field...with my children saying "MOM why are you stopping???" I said "just grabbing a little bit of cotton". Let's say there was a field A and a Field B. In field A there were some bright lights and a bunch of trucks...they were harvesting the cotton! I was thinking my timing couldn't be more perfect...go to Field B. If I had waited another day, the perfect cotton wouldn't be perfect anymore. My kids were thinking that Mom was going Straight to Jail!!!!! As I gathered my first armful, the exchange went like this....
She tasted just as sweet and delicious as he thought she would. Her lips were soft and pliant under his as she kissed him back, her tongue eagerly seeking his out.
I’m pretty sure I didn’t make up the term “advertising blindness” but I honestly don’t remember who I heard it from, so maybe I’ll just claim it.
I'm sure you can already guess that's not what happened. The difference between you and me is that I rallied. Rallying is always worth it, but you probably wouldn't know, because it's never happened to you.
Tuxedo legs dangling
Inks: Fresh Green kaleidacolor pad (leaves), dark chocolate for the trunk
Today marks the new year. The year 2011. I can't believe how time has flown since you were born. And then again, I can't believe how much it has drug along.
First I paint on mat board, and then I cut the board into pieces. After that, I scan them into to my computer.
Woven crowns of clover
Use your thought-power every day for good purposes; be a force in the direction of evolution. Think each day of some one whom you know to be in sorrow, or suffering, or in need of help and pour out loving thought upon him.
You know when you’re rusty at riding the next day or later that night. If you have ridden before, you know what I mean.
But sentient beings are agents. We do things because of greed or lust or ambition or fear. We can also refrain from doing things because of these motives. We have a sense of fairness, of justice. We can behave in accordance with a sense of fairness....or not.
Give me the long ball and a good back end of the bullpen and your team will win a lot of games. The Phillies had some pop in the lineup and strong power arms in the bullpen last night at AAA and high A with Kratz and Diekman and Hewitt and Bonilla.
Revenge
In this model, consciousness is like the light in a film projector. The film needs the light in order for an image to appear, but it does not create the light. In a similar way, the brain creates the images, thoughts, feelings and other experiences of which we are aware, but awareness itself is already present.
But this Safavieh hand-knotted rug, which originally retailed for $8000, was marked down to $3000, then $1500, and then finally clearanced at $995. My clients grabbed it. I'm so glad they were the lucky ones! So the lesson is look deep at HomeGoods and look for the big stuff—rugs, furniture. You might get lucky someday.
With the above information, we’re beginning to see some differences between
At the risk of seeming like a complete rube, I must admit that I was almost just as excited for “Sports Day” (Korea’s equivalence to Track and Field day) at my school. Clearly this is not because I would be competing in any events nor receiving any ribbons, but I was mainly excited because I knew–if nothing else–that I would be spared from teaching classes and would be able to spend the whole day outside.
You can become Exalted with Gnomeregan by buying a Gnomeregan Tabard and wearing it while in any instance, including low level ones. You will get reputation for every mob killed. The mounts are all available just outside Kharanos.
Mr. Maharaj said he believed that The Mail & Guardian was using him as political football to raise opposition to the protection bill.
In the process of Fr. John walking through the process of remembrance, you could feel the presence of the Lord moving in powerfully. Maybe it was the awkwardness of doing something so structured, the idea that many in this church were also dealing with it but also that slight refreshing reverence found so absent from non-mainline churches today.
My plan here was to show some embarrassing photos and stories of Emily, but....ummmm....this is what I found, and, well,they are more embarrassing to myself.
Dick Clark, the creator of "American Bandstand" and "Dick Clark's New Year's Rockin' Eve," died Wednesday morning, his rep tells FoxNews.com.
“Good night sir,” they shouted as the car park barrier raised, “and be careful, it is very dangerous on the roads in South Africa at night.”
So the land was rented out, and the funds used to purchase a much more rural environment -- on the outskirts of New Brighton, Staten Island, along the shore of the Kill Van Kull (the neck of water between SI and Bayonne). Finally in October of 1831, work finally began on Snug Harbor's many unique buildings.
Amber Kingsnorth – YES. Since entering the field 6 years ago, we’ve noticed a huge shift in the design community. Designers are finally seeing each other as colleagues rather than competition, sharing ideas, sources, information, horror stories… and it’s great!
The book is hardgoing but unputdownable. A mix of personal anecdote and opinion, and an expose of the cruelties of bringing meat to the table. Great confirmation of held beliefs.
Provide jarrings
“God I want YOU!”
Almost all of the clips of Lee Brilleaux talking in Oil City Confidential were taken from an interview filmed in the 'back bar' of The Grand in the early 1990s (you can just see the 'front bar' behind him). The whole 50 minute interview is also on the DVD as an extra.
It is all the Word of God from Genesis to Revelation. Paul’s words in Acts 22 are just as much the Holy Scriptures as is the Sermon on the Mount in Matthew 5-7. For the apostle to make his defence, he reviewed what God had done in his life from conversion to commission. It was his testimony and is well established as the Word of God.
Upstairs in my other uncle’s tiny room,
…I had another therapy session today, and I had lots of good news to share with the therapist. Once again, she asked some really great questions that got me thinking and making connections. I know that as I uncover the deeper truths about my behaviors and beliefs I will be successful in my journey. This is the final piece of the puzzle that’s been missing for so long, and it’s why I’ve failed in my previous efforts to lose weight.
The Beer Ambassadors are Barney Mathews and Miro Bellini from Beer Deluxe and "Road Goat" Tom Delmont who recently travelled the US to ... well, to drink beer, really. Tonight Ale Stars will be regaled by the stories of their trip.
My Mommy set me free.
But what about the footballing position of the Newco?
Makes an 8-inch cheesecake; serves 10
Balvenie DoubleWood 12yr – 40%
Anyway, during this visit to the South's surrender spot, ooops, I mean to "where the country was brought together" spot, they were having a Civil War re-enactment. Well, really more of an encampment, since there wasn't any battle waging going on, but a small demonstration.
This is sarcastic, but it’s also painful. A tough situation sparks sarcasm, but also injury to the teen soul. Stephanie Plum wouldn’t be so bitter about her mom’s drinking; it doesn’t have to affect her anymore. The character here, on the other hand, completely internalizes this situation, and when prompted to think of a moment of thoughtfulness in relation to her mother’s boyfriends, relates it back to herself to understand, for us to understand.
He told me he loved me to and was happy that he was special.
With Callie everything has been different.
So, as we understand it, Prowind has to reapply for a FIT contract.
Have a great first day,
Darkness pales, the sky grows clear,
Following "The Loner", we get the albums only real misstep; a cover of the 1967-hit "Friday on my Mind" by the Australian band The Easybeats. The song is by no means bad, but it feels very unneccesary being on an album where the original material is so strong. I'm pretty sure that recording a cover for the album was more the record company's idea than Gary Moore's.
I've reached a turning point in my life. I'm at that age where it's too late to go back to college, and too early to retire. So I need to find something new to do with my life. I think it's time for Beer School.
e) L$2500 Gift Certificate from Fierce Designs, Inc.
I think children want to read what I was reading when I was young: interesting, imaginative, exciting books that don't talk down to them. But kids are all different as well. Some like swords and dragons, some like spaceships, some like vampire romances. The best we can do is offer a huge variety of books and let them decide.
Are you spiritually paralyzed? Do you need a doctor for your soul? Jesus is the Divine Physician and has given us a new heart in our Baptism, yet we need to have regular checkups and receive the medicine that keeps us healthy, namely the Eucharist. Ask some friends for help, if they say no, it is my opinion that you should get new friends! Spiritually, we were all paralyzed at one time. Our meetings are not anonymous though, they are public and we need to support each other every day on our road to recovery, called Heaven.
The business model of PAEs focuses on purchasing and asserting patents against manufacturers already using the technology, rather than developing and transferring technology. Some argue that PAEs encourage innovation by compensating inventors, but this argument ignores the fact that invention is only the first step in a long process of innovation. Even if PAEs arguably encourage invention, they can deter innovation by raising costs and risks without making a technological contribution.
So I’ve been wondering what inspires the “map” inside the store. The most likely explanation may be physical constraints like needing electric hookups for the refrigerators and freezers. If practicality rules the day, it is for the convenience of the store owners, not necessarily for the shoppers. If they wanted to be kind to shoppers, the furniture would be close to the cashiers and exits so there would be less distance to push the heaviest items they sell.
This artifact aligns with AECT Standard 5.4
Hoping to hit the water soon with some good chatter to follow.
The NDAA is a huge assault on due process, the rule of law, and civil liberties as we’ve known them. I’m pleading for Takoma Park to stand tall against it. I again respectfully ask Mayor Williams to place this NDAA resolution on the council agenda.
So I'm pretty sure we're just going to have to agree to disagree about this.
How deeply a student observes these patterns, reflects on them, and tries to share them with others will lead to different levels of understanding and meaning.
Writing in 2006, Dutch linguistic journalist Ewoud Sanders examined various origin theories offered over the last century for the word. There's no clear winner, but he offered a convincing explanation for the side of the attorneys:
1 warm
We greet them at the airport. They are tired but they are still smiling. President Khamohee speaks good English but his wife only a little. The smile communicates greatly.
Image of: US stocks dip after conflicting economic reports
Yes, I KNOW the lowest layer should be a shift...I don't have one...it's on the list...I'll get to it eventually!!!
sees it rather differently.
Dinner in Broadway Joe's was followed by drinks, more drinks and then possibly a drink or two. Five of us showed the city a good time and finished up in an Irish bar. Where else would you go for a fun night out?
PIIPA is Public Interest Intellectual Property Advisors, Inc. It describes itself as "a global nonprofit resource for emerging economies and public interest organizations in developing countries seeking expertise in intellectual property matters to promote health, agriculture, biodiversity, science, culture, and the environment". The second in PIIPA's series of Pro Bono IP Case Studies has now been circulated by email. It reads as follows:
Maybe one day, you'll make light of it all and write a blog about it :)
To all the wonderfully dysfunctional mothers out there....happy mothers day. We are what makes the world interesting. I hope you get a day of peace, where no one fights with each other, no one pees on the floor, and maybe the kids remember to flush for a change. A day where the kids let
Staple Gun and Staples (size depending on how thick your plywood is)
According to a report from Intellectual Property Watch on February 12, 2005, participants at the invite-only meeting on patent harmonization earlier this month in Washington agreed to hold meetings of two working groups, one on substantive patent law harmonisation â€“ chaired by Australia â€“ and the other on development issues, covering proposals at WIPO on development and on genetic resources â€“ chaired jointly by the Netherlands and the United Kingdom. The chairs volunteered and were not opposed, one participant said.
1 1/2 C. heavy cream
WHO CAME FIRST…?
Thank you very much Jay Jay, I wrote my blog addy out in full then added /ncr at the end and my edit link are back, hopefully for good but if not at least it helps for now lol,
Until 28th February 2010
“What To Do with Henry?” Retired Ohio teacher Pearl travels to Sierra Leone to bring to Canton the daughter Neneh her husband sired during one of his research trips. Henry the chimpanzee joins them.
This is much much better than the first versions.
An appropriate body type would be selected from the various canvases stored in the back of the artist's wagon and the subject's head would then be painted on the body.
Just for the record, let me remind you that I'm 3 for 3 when calling the bottom 3.
OVERBY: Yeah, one proposal is called the ALEC Attorney General Authority Act. And to really boil it down, it would give state legislatures more power to tell attorneys general when they can and cannot file lawsuits. Just for example, it says the attorneys general's client is the state, not necessarily the people of the state.
Since becoming disabled myself, you’ve shown me more care than I could ever have wished for. Without you, my life would be so much more difficult.
I wish I could say.
We had my Grandma's 91st birthday, I loved how her hat turned out! she didn't notice a lot but we put it on her and she wore it the whole afternoon, so I guess it was fine.
"The gas I have allowed to flow in is a form of gaseous sodium metal. I suppose really I should say a mixture of colloidal sodium vapor and inert argon. The sodium alone will not cause the catalytic action, the argon being necessary to the action. Please note the burning jet under the cabinet."
Stay tuned. Saturday's a brew day.
Make a lasting impression this holiday season with a unique gift from one of Kybele’s partnering countries. Shop from a wide variety of colorful handmade bags from Ghana, stylish pashminas from Turkey, papyrus wall hangings from Egypt, jewelry from Romania, and much more.
Monday is the first day of spring and our thoughts turn to living outside as soon as the sun warms us. Spring is also the time when we go out on our deck and assess the winter rain and snow damage. For many of us after we refinish the deck and replant the planters with colorful flowers, we realize that the outdoor furniture is looking a little shabby. Rather than take that high-gas price road trip, we decide to shop for new deck furniture. The home décor magazines stimulate us with pictures of rattan garden furniture in light and dark shades.
Your heart melted. I can tell. I sense it dripping onto your keyboard. This little man is a new arrival in my life (dog walker on the side). If he were to be a human, he would be everything you love wrapped in a fuzzy fur coat. Shit, let’s be real, this little guy would be sunshine, rainbows and unicorns wrapped in the body of Ryan Gosling. I can’t even stereotype a puppy… it seems wrong.
It seems she has a hoola hoop, red boots and a great camera with her! I have no cake or name for my trip. Yet. However, I do have a box of puzzles for the conference raffle, brown AND BLUE hiking shoes and my iPhone camera! Maybe I'll put a few unschooling bumper stickers on my car just to really live dangerously.
2) eBay
and slip below the surface.
who turned her on to Bulgarian music, but it was Joe Boyd
Mitt Romney was asked today about racial statements in the Book of Mormon. He avoided answering the question.
Homemade Macaroni and Cheese
Much of the hype and hoopla surrounded Prince Fielder and the Tigers other two big stars in Thursday’s season opener at Comerica Park.
Finally there are the additions to /etc/asterisk/extensions_custom.conf. We will need to add at least two contexts to that file. The first handles inbound calls from Google Voice. You only need ONE of these no matter how many Google Voice users you have, but you have a choice between two contexts. Remember that at the start of this article I said you had to decide whether you want to answer the call as soon as it comes into your system, or defer answering until a destination extension picks up. Well, if you decided to let Asterisk answer the call as soon at it arrives, then you’ll need to add this context:
“Why didn’t the wolf eat the boy?”
In contrast, Mitt Romney, Obama's presumptive Republican rival, not only opposes same-sex marriage but favors a Constitutional amendment to forbid it. That position is safe for Romney because to believe otherwise would alienate his already shaky party base. It is just as safe for the president because few voters are likely to cross over to the Republican side in November simply because he has now endorsed same-sex marriage and it will be a fundraising boon for him.
Lots of studying going on.
At our Authors Electric Great E-Book Giveaway last week, I gave away 621 digital copies of The Boy With Hawk-like Eyes in the US and 106 in the UK: a modest amount, but significant. The readers who enjoyed it will be looking for the other Sprite Sisters stories. As any fantasy reader knows, you want the next in the series
"No CEO of a construction firm could have passed the buck in the way you have tried to do. In the end it's your company, your employees, your profits and your responsibility."
When somebody lashes out at another it is often because they have been hurt themselves. The easiest thing to do is to get offended, to get our guard up, and to hit back. That was my reaction. That probably isn't the best thing to do though.
High school: Level XI though Level XV.
2 march - Hipnoza - Katowice, Poland
This house in an adorable quarter scale house kit that I bought from Suzanne Larson-Tamburo.
Satan has a stake in keeping us separated from the joy of the Lord because it is linked with our strength. If we are sapped of strength, we will have difficulty in moving forward out of the hassles, anxieties and warfare we are in. Furthermore, we will not have the ability to receive the strategy we need to move into our next season.
· The Lettermen
Hey Bastard – S.T.P.
If you read through all of that, I thank you. The story at the top came to me last night, and I've been thinking for a while that two of my greatest writing weaknesses are Sci-fi and action, so I thought I'd give myself a writing exercise this morning that would stretch me in both of those areas. Let me know how you thought I did either in the comments below, or on facebook.
London., — June 8, 2010 — Adobe Systems Incorporated (Nasdaq:ADBE) today announced the immediate availability of Adobe® Photoshop® Lightroom® 3 software for Windows® and Macintosh, the essential digital photography workflow solution that allows photographers to quickly organize, enhance and showcase their images from one application. First released as a public beta in October 2009, the final version of Lightroom 3 introduces a completely redesigned performance architecture that better handles growing image libraries and provides an unrivaled raw processing engine with noise reduction and sharpening tools to achieve the highest image quality. The 64-bit capable Lightroom 3 includes new features that optimise workflows and allow images to be shared in creative ways, including support for DSLR video files and tethered shooting on select cameras.
With the days growing longer and the evenings getting warmer the urge to play with my grills is getting strong. This year in addition to eating great I plan on refining my skills on the grill. I’ve spent the winter working on knife skills and traditional cooking skills, time to tackle those things that always give me trouble at the grills.
What I'm going to do is make a selection of cookies that can be stored together, and make them smaller in size-about the size of a gingersnap. The recipes below have instructions for larger cookies, so it's important to watch the baking time. Smaller cookies WILL take less time to bake. Watch the first baking sheet of cookies carefully, and take note of how long you bake until they are done. Be sure to preheat the oven first, or this won't be accurate.
Never got to control, but now I’m the host.
But that isn't all there is.
The earthquake was certainly an experience – I was in the basement offices at school surrounded by ground and waiting for the 50 year old brick buildings to come crashing down. But by the time we figured out what was happening and ran out of the building, it was over.
I did not forget about the Celebrity Blog Challenge today, which is day 21. The category today is Entertainment Shows that you watch and I do not watch any at all. More for lack of time than anything, if I watch anything on TV it is a movie, something on Bravo, or another TV show I have missed like Gossip Girl, Mad Men, Glee, etc.
Next, select 15 blogs/bloggers that you’ve recently discovered or follow regularly.
Will shortly go and sit in front of the woodburner with a glass of wine and my knitting - I am currently knitting a dishcloth, very relaxing I find as I can switch off my whirring thoughts because I have to count what I am doing. A bit like counting sheeep, but more productive!
1 tablespoon baking cocoa
I Will Dare
There are people who read this blog that have known me a long time and they can tell you that our family was the perfect white picket fence, annoyingly happy family that no one thinks exists. Of course, we had ups and downs and hard times, but our foundation was solid. Our kids are good caring people and my marriage had been the kind people dream of. Twenty years with a man I have always adored and who has always cared for me and put me first. I have my faults and he has his, but somehow we just fit. I have always been able to be me and to get through life's obstacles because my husband was by my side. When my brother died, he was the rock. He took care of everything as my father and I tried to get through the day. When our daughter A came home from China and our family was reeling from the realities of what life had tossed her way, he made sure everything was taken care of, so I could focus solely on her. He is kind and generous and strong and he has always been who I turned to, but this time I couldn't.
The task of dealing with the attackers fell upon Afghan security forces. American and NATO troops were reported to have been playing a ‘supportive’ role. Gunfire, rocket fire and suicide bombings were all part of the insurgent operation.
For All Entry Methods: Failure to submit all required information in the manner required in these Official Rules and/or any entry or contribution form may result in disqualification. Proof of contribution or online entry will not be deemed to be proof of receipt of entry by Sponsor. All entrants and entries are subject to verification by Sponsor. Entries will not be acknowledged or returned. By entering the Promotion, you consent to being placed on an e-mail mailing list to receive information from Sponsor and for other purposes in accordance with Sponsor's Privacy Policy. Individuals may not enter the Promotion by any and all methods combined more than ten (10) times in any calendar day.
There was one small scene, however, that continued to trouble our conscientious star, and no amount of waffle on our part could convince him that he had its proper significance within his sights. This was where, as an American scientist in East Berlin for reasons I need not go into, he has a meeting with Julie Andrews who has to place a package into his hands, for reasons I no longer remember. Newman's problem, as he agonized it to Hitchcock during the camera rehearsal, was on the lines of: 'Hitch, it seems to me I have a situation here with Julie, I have a situation with the package, I have a situation with being in East Berlin and I have a situation with the problem of our being observed. Now how should I be relating in this scene?' HItchcock, having listened courteously, delivered his judgment in his measured, plummy accents: 'Well, Mr. Newman, I'll tell you exactly what I have in mind here. Miss Andrews will come down the stairs with the package, d'you see, when you, if you'll be so good, will glance just a little to the right of camera to take in her arrival; whereupon my audience will say, "Hulloh! What's this fellow looking at?" And then I'll cut away, d'you see, and show them what you're looking at.'
I have placed limits on reassessment to keep me sane and to prevent students from waiting until the end of the term. Students must give me 48 hours notice so I have time to put together a reassessment. Learning objectives from each chapter are broken into two groups and students can only assess on one set each day. Students can only reassess on Mondays, Tuesday s, or Fridays. Finally, a student must reassess within three weeks of the previous assessment on a particular set of learning objectives. If they fail in that attempt, they can reassess again as long as it is within the next three weeks. The goal of this last limit is to prevent students from waiting until the last few weeks of the term to churn through all learning objectives.
Chicken Pasta Bake
jist fer you, Ms Mississippi Sue.
(by Gary Henry)
their significant features?
12-07 Ottawa, Ontario - Scotiabank Place
The Journal of Risk Research published the study online today. It was funded by the National Science Foundation’s division of Social and Economic Sciences.
"Lionheart" (both released in 1978), found a place right next
I went to his wedding a few years ago, back when I first started dating Ross. I didn't really know anyone there. It was at Barr Mansion, and there was a seated stringed trio, and salad with pink dressing, and smiled anecdotes in the air about the couple and their courtship.
Boop Boop (the noise a train makes when the horn is beeped)
There is some doubt whether that is still true.
3/9/12 I am thankful
9. Was a part of Bree Wee's Spreading Aloha to the Marshallese project. This was my first time bringing holiday cheer to folks who don't have much and the best Christmas for me in years!
(boner)
What was interesting for us as we wandered around watching the goths and steampunks get asked to pose for photos on every corner, was that for once, we weren't the strangest dressed people there! Although we were actually asked to pose for a photo by one couple who notice us anyway.
What can I say? Use each of these words in a sentence.
We made the border crossing at Buffalo, NY and got through without any issues. This was our 10th and final border crossing for Our Great RV Escape. Although other people have reported unpleasant experiences going back and forth between Canada and the US in their RVs, we've had no trouble at all. Perhaps we're just lucky.
While this mess is recognized by the senior political leadership, the public image the state-controlled media puts out there is that the Chinese armed forces are ready for anything and capable of handling any foe. You can get away with that kind of propaganda in peacetime, but once these troops go into combat, it all falls apart. Keep that in mind the next time China rattles its saber, because the Chinese leaders are.
It is in the way she, in the middle of playing, gets up and comes over and hugs me for no reason other than to do it. It nearly knocks me for a loop every time, makes my heart a puddle of warm goo. It is in the way she leans back against me and lets out a little sigh when I watch yet another silly cartoon with her. It is in the way she sometimes turns to me and touches my face like she is seeing it for the first time.
When you can, please visit the other contributing bloggers to show your appreciation of their endeavours. Due to time zone variations and overcrowded schedules, some contributions are made later than Tuesday/Wednesday.
- Seeing is as important as doing, expanding your sensory awareness: touch, sight, smell, sound, seeing patterns, themes.
I’ve just been denied acceptance into the university I so desperately wanted to go to. I was supposed to go there in the fall of 2012 and start my studies in becoming a Paralegal. I’ve been denied, and now I don’t know what to do.
7.) “You can’t connect the dots looking forward, you can only connect them looking backward…So you have to trust in something, your gut, destiny, life, karma, whatever. Believing that the dots will connect down the road will give you the confidence to follow your heart even if it leads you off the well worn path, and that will make all the difference.”–Steve Jobs
We've had some good times together, America. Who's to say we won't see more? So let's just pretend like it's old times tonight. After a nice meal at Applebee's, we'll get drunky-drunk on cheap wine and dance naked in the sprinkler. Then we'll pump up the air mattress right there in the backyard and I'll do that thing with my pinky that makes you moan like a sick owl.
I don't always cry............
A+ and smiley faces all around. This one's a keeper.
To enter, comment on this post (click previous link and scroll) and include an email address (formatted like: cynthia at cynthialeitichsmith dot com) or a link to an email address. Or you can email Cynthia directly with "The Five Lives of Our Cat Zook" in the subject line. Author sponsored. Eligibility: U.S./Canada. Deadline: 11:59 CST May 14. Note: please indicate if you're entering for a critique/book or both.
For LEAGUE OF STRAYS, I feel the importance is to let teens know the dangers in following others blindly. My character, Charlotte, ends up in a new school Senior year and gets caught up in “friendship” with several kids, one of whom is a sociopath, who she follows until it becomes very challenging for her to repair her life. It’s also tangentially about revenge and bullies and the damage they do. Lastly, it’s about developing your own dreams and holding onto them.
so this got me thinking how much i have come on since then and i thought id set us all a little challenge till the end of may.
1 set of jump leads in case of cardiac arrest
Try a limited blockade targeting only England and the Commonwealth nations (where the English Monarch is the head of that organisation – any countries choosing to drop out of Commonwealth can resume trade with Mercosur . . . ). Uruguay’s suggestion plays both sides as much as the above suggestion does. 30% (pro-West) /70% (pro-South American nations)! Should Uruguay concur with the above selective blockade suggestion, we’ll all be sure that Uruguay is on the right side of things.
So, coffee in hand, cat next to me (purring and jockeying for a spot on my lap in place of my computer), with children asleep in their beds in honor of MLK day (they dream “Free at last, free at last, thank God almighty…free to sleep in at last!”) …here I am–staying home from work until things warm up–assuming, of course, that things warm up.
Our kitchen, where many a discussion has taken place
A 40-minute tempo run would begin with 10 minutes of easy running and would build to the fastest pace in the next 20 minutes.
At least 9 people were killed and 23 wounded in the four attacks, and a gun battle around a half-built high-rise building raged on into the evening as NATO and Afghan attack helicopters circled overhead.
I think that Alum Cave Trail may rate as one of my all-time favorites in the Smokies thus far. The trail is challenging but beautiful and the many views are well worth the effort. This is the second time this summer I've been up LeConte, and I'm excited about taking a trip up sometime to stay the night.
We are taking kids (from the North) from grades 4-9 to summer camps in the center of the country. We do it to distance the kids from the inferno, and the growing trauma, to put a smile back on their faces, to give them an open space to run, and let them use their imagination and creativity. Also, no less important we want to give their parents a rest, some quiet and a little bit less to worry about. I also think that the father of a house when there is less on his shoulders and some of the overload is released it is more likely that he will stay in his city, and in his home. We are also helping pack food and generally to help the city.
Now we move onto those who are due after me. (And by after I mean due after me by at least 2 wks) Several of them are further along in the "my body is ready" process and I'm thinking some of them will probably give birth before me, especially since my MTF is so hesitant/refuses to give me an induction date.
Testament to his major preference for huge cars.
March 24, 1934- October 3, 2006...
Do you have a favorite pistou recipe? I'd love to hear it!
If you're like me then you have no idea how to put together a party playlist. I am always eyeing the iPods of friends to see what songs they have on when we're over for a cocktail or dinner party. My playlists are built by decade or artist so guests will either get an all Elvis playlist or an all '80s playlist.
RK Motors Charlotte is also a sponsor of the Super Chevy Shows and the new Mega Mopar Action Series. “The team at Forward Sports Marketing has always been helpful and, more importantly, they understand our goals as a company. The Super Chevy shows have been a great experience for us so, when the opportunity came to get on board with the Fun Ford Series, it was a no-brainer.”
RYAN MORELAND: Thank you, I’m thrilled to be collaborating on this mission!
Another thing to realize is that even if your book is ranked in the Top 100 of more than 1 genre or in more than 1 catalog, it's very possible for only 1 of those Top 100 rankings to be displayed. DON'T PANIC. Your book will display in the appropriate bestseller lists, which is what matters.
But it's true about a long journey, about how the destination sometimes doesn't matter as much as the adventure of it and the companionship.
One of the most insightful descriptions of Mandela's political views is found in The Richmond News-Leader of May 2, 1986:
Yes, the president of the university was technically Paterno’s boss, but if Paterno wanted an investigation or if he wanted to take any action towards finding out if the allegations were true, it would have been done immediately, with or without the blessing from the president.
Started a workshop this week...I'll share more about that as I get into it, but so far I am loving it. There's art work and creative journaling so far so how could a girl go wrong, right?
We loved to talk about why we shouldn't be fucking because we worked together. That his dissertation was serious business. One night at Lucky's, he said, “What if you don't do as good a job because you're pissed at me? And I said, “What if you're overly critical of my edits because you're pissed at me?” Then he pulled my bar stool closer, and tried to kiss me. I pushed it back, said, “I'm serious. It's unprofessional.” He'd say, “Ok, ok. No more fucking until we're done.” That was the end of it. Until we stood on the corner of Seventh Avenue and Christopher Street , and he shoved me up against a store window, and kissed me.
Our noble yet incredibly hip friends at Valcour Records have just released The Best of Valcour Records Volume One. It is mind-boggling that in only five years, Joel Savoy, Lucius Fontenot, and Phillip LaFargue have created not only the finest label recording Louisiana artists, but a label that these musicians actually aspire to record for. The Best of Valcour Records Volume One is a collection from their varied stable of artist, from the Pine Leaf Boys to Cedric Watson. There are toe-tapping cuts by Courtbouilion, Corey Ledet, Bonsoir Catin, Red Stick Ramblers, Feufollet, Joel Savoy and Linzay Young, and also The Cajun Country Revival.
Do you apologize for wrong doings and misunderstandings? As much as possible. One of the biggest gifts we try to give our crazy little boys is the ability to have their voice. Using good communication makes it easier on both parts. Tell me you are mad. Tell me I am hurting you. Tell me that you do not think I am fair. However with telling us these things we are more apt to communicate not only our direction and discipline but also our reasoning and feeling behind those actions. Or if we are being hurtful and unfair, their communication can help us realize this so we can apologize like in the bank scenario.
The Flower Market has so many beautiful images and provided me the lavender in the background and the beautiful striking butterfly.
There are also many cases of extreme loss or intense turmoil, when all of the ego’s building blocks – its roles and attachments – are broken away. A person might be diagnosed with cancer and told they only have a few months left to live; an alcoholic might reach ‘rock bottom’ and be on the point of suicide; a person might become seriously disabled through injury or illness; or they might suffer from the trauma of bereavement, depression, the destruction of hopes and beliefs, and so on. In most cases, these forms of loss simply bring sadness and suffering, but for a minority of individuals, they can trigger a spiritual awakening. With all its scaffolding broken down, the normal ego-self dissolves away, and our deeper, truer self emerges in its place, like a butterfly from a caterpillar. The person feels re-born, like a different person inhabiting the same body, with a new sense of meaning and connection.
If you pay $50,000 a year toward workers’ health care premiums–and you qualify for a 15 percent credit–you’ll save $7,500. If you save $7,500 a year from tax year 2010 through 2013, that’s a total savings of $30,000. And, if in 2014 you qualify for a slightly larger credit, say 20 percent, your savings go from $7,500 a year to $12,000 a year.
I have not run away from being your shepherd,
Please note that when purchasing MWR Trading cards from the wrestlers, that they decide the prices for their cards. We highly recommend that you get them from the stars themselves and let them know that you enjoy MWR.
For the first 6 minutes or so, you listen to the members of SMAP talk about how that night was the last night of their tour, and how the year before was tough because one of their members had to leave the band for a while.
Religion shall be held a jest,
Here is a list of cuts you need to create this card:
Total Mid Estimate: $350000
9. Antique compact (thrifted)
As we can see, the Conservatives, Liberals and especially the Bloc Quebecois have an overall negative party brand, as the negative terms about them outweigh the positive ones. The Greens and especially the NDP have overall positive party brands. Things becomes particularly good for the NDP and particularly bad for the Liberals and Bloc Quebecois when one makes the same calculation yet treats the subjective terms as entirely positive or negative.
Photo by MK Metz
85. He is the visual of EXO-K.
Yesterday I did some more research about fructose and ate some sneaky pieces of dark chocolate. Nothing quite satisfied me but I knew that the links between fructose and obesity were coming. I was just ahead of the curve, I am just an early adopter. It was the day after I first read Sweet Poison and things were still a bit scary. I still felt really confronted but eager to know more. Being the 21st century female that I am I decided to hit up Facebook. The Sweet Poison Facebook page is fantastic! I have given the link in previous posts so look there. There are heaps of people up there who have done the brave thing and are ready to provide support and information where they can. If you decide to head down a similar path to me then they are fantastic. Any questions or help you need they are a great source.
This is the measure of the degree of perceived interdependence a society has. Which sounds complex and jargony but basically means that this is the measure of how much people see themselves as individuals vs part of a community. An individualistic society is where people tend to look after themselves and their family and tend to think in terms of ‘I’ while a collectivistic society thinks of themselves as part of group and thinks in terms of ‘we’. In a collectivist society the needs of the many outweigh the needs of the few.
Everyday is an adventure here. Mostly filled with shopping. But sometimes, we get to explore the hidden gems of Thailand only the locals (my relatives) know and love. One of them was this wonderful little restaurant off the side of the Chao Praya River where we had the most delectable seafood I have ever tasted! Another gem I've discovered is "farung" aka guava juice. It is much different from the hawaiian guava and so much more tastier!
Errant thoughts whirl me
Even with a fifteen minute head start in the oven, the bottom layer was a little moist… not underdone, but more reminiscent of a lemon bar than shortbread. Still the overall result was pretty good. Since the top stayed crumbly, it had a nice craggy, somewhat crunchy texture. As the shortbread is sweet, it’s definitely better that the jam is tart. It would be interesting to try this recipe again on a stand mixer, and see how it differs with the dough thoroughly combined. It might also be fun to combine another tart fruit with the rhubarb. I saw a rhubarb-raspberry preserves, which was my backup plan had I not obtained fresh rhubarb.
Please pray for the following (in addition to all of the other requests!)
AAR frowns on that..but you probably don't need to worry about that now...maybe not ever.
They became very popular in their region and put out a single on their own Presidential Records in early 1982. The run of 500 copies was financed with help from their family and features a cover designed by David Hughes, which is reminiscent of the logo on the Clash's first record. The 7" showcases their most popular song "Hologram," which contains hand claps and a poppier sound than they intended. Sounding like a long lost Ramones cut, "Hologram" still holds up strong today, while the flip has more of a post-punk feel and is more representative of the bands developing sound.
After an hour of airtime I landed and contemplated on what just happened. My conclusion is that since I try to adapt to change fairly quickly I also tend to move on or 'forget' my actions in the past. For instance, after a day or 2 at the competition in Oregon, I got into cross-country flying mode & was staying up in rougher conditions than I would normally. When I came back & started flying tandems, I switched it off & went back into boating around looking for smooth air to keep my passengers from puking. But when trying to fly back in thermic conditions yesterday I was stuck in a tandem headspace and had lost that confidence so recently gained from flying in rougher air.
Then Simon Peter said, “Are we supposed to know this?” And Andrew said, “Will we have a test on this?” And Philip said, “I don’t have any paper.” And Bartholomew said, “Do we have to turn this in?” And John said, “The other disciples didn’t have to learn this.” And Luke said, “What’s this got to do with real life?” And Mark said, “Huh?” And Matthew said, “Can I go to the bathroom?” Then one of the Pharisees who was present asked to see Jesus’ lesson plan and inquired, “Where are your objectives and your required competencies in the cognitive domain?” Thomas, who had missed the sermon, came to Jesus privately and said, “Did we do anything important today?”
Fleetwood Mac Little lies UK
What is of significance is how those who should have known better, those who's job it is to protect, teach or inform society dealt with her allegations, and what their motives were for doing so. To those people, the ones who exploited the lies of a mad woman for their own ends and for the sake of a political ideology, I will not extend the same right of anonymity.
I have missed blogging and have been badgered by many people to start up again, particularly with my oh-so-amusing disaster stories, and uber geek stuff. So here goes, blog 1 of 2012.
I have always loved asparagus. These were especially yummy and I could totally tell how much difference the freshness made. Tender, spring asparagus with a nice nutty taste. Mmm, hmmm.
NilFisk Videos
Apart, of course, from reviewers. Strangely enough, my first venture into journalism was reviewing children’s books. I was 18 and working as a messenger girl on a national paper and Sharon, the editor of the children’s page gave me some books to review. The very first one was about a hamster. I enjoyed writing reviews, and I loved seeing my name in print. I spared not a moment’s thought for the poor author of the hamster book, reading and re-reading my verdict on her work. I went on to review many books. I never thought about the authors. I especially liked hardback books, because I could sell them at the second hand book shop. It's only now, as a writer, that I appreciate the power that I wielded.
I had been leisurely looking for just the right material to use for a while now, but couldn't’ find anything thin enough. I didn’t want it too thick because our butcher block island top doesn’t hang over a ton. I wanted something with a low profile.
It is thought that if Arrowcroft and the council receive written confirmation that there is no overage provision, they will make an offer to buy the land owned by Stanhope and Schroders after evidence on the site’s value is heard next week.
I realize my list is a little more focused on the female population of the world, but if you are a male and want to dive into this challenge, there are lots of possibilities for you, too! Some of these things like photography, technology, self-publishing are for either gender, and you could add things like preaching, construction...whatever your little heart desires! Hey, you could research knitting if you wanted, I won't tell. :)
In the context of these crimes - sorry, vibrant success stories - and the general immigrant ghettoes which now exist in some Swedish cities, it's nice to know that someone else can carry the can. In this case, the scapegoat is Britain, rather than racism and Islamophobia.
Thank you to all of my students for those moments.
“It confuses me in the most exciting way,” she said.
Many people buy in. Joe Maddon's cousin, Elaine Curry, and her husband Bob lead the effort try to make his vision real. They search for a good place to build the community center. They look for opportunities to help people understand each other. Bob Curry says there has been amazing response to their efforts, that people are rallying behind the effort. Together they holds a fundraiser dinner that is one of the biggest events of the year -- Maddon, obviously, has a lot of pull in the baseball world. He brings Yogi Berra and Don Zimmer to town for the dinner. There are numerous cool sports items for a silent auction. About 450 tickets go on sale and sell out almost instantly. Curry says if they had 1,000 tickets, those would have sold too.
(And so nobody gets things in the wrong way:
I so often reach for my stash of Rainbow Splendour goodies when I'm adding the details to my pages... they are SO gorgeous and also so easy to incorporate into your embellishment clusters.
Some people think of advocacy as "standing up for someone else." It can be that. Sometimes, it is that. But I try to do advocacy so that I give people a chance to speak up for themselves. Shame is one of the most debilitating side effects of poverty. Some people are so ashamed of being poor, of being homeless, of having to eat in a soup kitchen, that they feel like they are somehow less than human just because they need help. The opportunity to get involved in advocacy, to stand up for yourself, to use your experience to help other people who may find themselves in your situation someday, is one of the most powerful ways to banish shame. I'm lucky to work for an organization that prioritizes providing direct services like meals, medical care, and shelter as well as working for social justice.
The SACP has demanded to be consulted as a full partner of the tripartite alliance instead of ANC decisions being imposed on it.
We hope that we will be in a position to give you full details before the end of April so that the all-member ballot can commence around the start of May."
Break into three: Shaun realizes that they’re on a lift, and he and Liz decide to go back up to street level to take their chances.
Eyeliner has to be drawn in a line. First you’d have to moisten the place you’re going to apply the eyeliner and then use the cotton to swab. At first it was hard, but the more we do it the more proficient i get. Now I know why it’s important for the girls to do it. Haha.
January 23, 2009 — Police discover George Anthony, who had been text messaging family members, despondent and possibly under the influence of alcohol and medication in hotel room. Police also discovered a lengthy suicide note.
Krewe of Proteus: Totally themed on Egyptian mythology, dates back to 1882, and the second oldest Krewe
Not much to see on the way to a drop. Your average cut-rate corporate intra-system can don’t rate windows–windows is for sphere-jockeys and jump chumps who think there’s shit to see out the window of a spaceship. Pulled duty on a can like that once, in my life before all this shit started. Chumps’d plant their afts in cushy accel-couches and stare out big-ass windows for hours. You know what they saw? Stars. Coulda run that same action by poking holes in a sheet and stowing it over their cabin lights.
My book is going to be called FALL TO PIECES. I think it's super cool. Especially since I can pinpoint the exact scenes in the novel that it's about (hopefully they'll still be there when the book releases, and then you guys can try to figure them out).
I guess I should get back to "work", and quit daydreaming about being somewhere else. HAHA.
If only more people were to get sufficiently discouraged that they’d stop looking for work, we’d have this unemployment problem nailed.
One thing is not in doubt. The issues surrounding this tragedy discussed by Pat Buchanan in his essay, “It’s All About Race Now,” will not be aired on CNN or MSNBC.
Just image a meal, beginning to end, with cheese featured at every course. I think this is a very cool idea. This may be the only such restaurant in the world. I am not aware of any restaurants in Canada doing this.
Months and seasons change, so quickly we barely notice it one second, are painfully aware of it on the next. The movie begins with Hotaru, our protagonist, telling the story of her life. Even though she’s so young, she has a story to tell. A story that begins when Hotaru was a small child, so loving in her impulses and affection. It is then that she meets Gin in the forest, during her summer trip to her uncle’s place. She befriends Gin – despite him being a proclaimed spirit, and we witness their relationship across summers.
- John's Pizza-- anything or fresh mozzarella pizza
*So Sue Me Grilled Garlic Shrimp*
Sailors’ Bethel built at a cost of £2,000 to the design of Thos. Oliver Junior was opened on the 12th of April 1877. The word “Beth-el” is Hebrew for “House of God”, and in the 130 years of its existence this building has served as a nonconformist chapel, a community centre, a Danish seamen’s church and now, finally, offices.
But what I loved most about only being reachable by Poste Restante was the sense of freedom it gave me. Today when I'm on the road I have to let everyone know where I am every day or so or someone will get worried. Knowing I was off in the wilds of some foreign country relying only on my own wits was a rush. But like riding in the back of a pickup truck or biking without a helmet this little freedom is now denied to us - what everyone seems to think is most important is that we are safe.
Dr Ramsay's Definition for M.E.:
Hoping you all have a really wonderful holiday, filled with love and joy and and snow and children laughing and big fake santa clauses and alcohol and fat honkin' gifts and double rainbows and unicorn nuzzles, wherever you are.
And I have a message for children around the globe: If a 13-year-old girl could bake, anyone can!
I’ve said before that I like to hang around theater people. A big part of that is that they’re pretentious twats, and I find that deeply amusing. Another is that performing is the safest space for one looking to make a complete idiot out of themselves. My favorite thing about taking acting classes was all of the ridiculous shit we did to get inside the heads of our characters. For one exercise, we had to imagine ourselves as animals and crawl around on the floor for a while as our teacher told us to look for food and a place to sleep. A passerby would look in the window and see grown men and women acting like gorillas, lions, and stoats. (I actually spent time on Wikipedia reading about the various members of the Mustelidae family so that I could decide whether a ferret or a weasel would be a better fit.) And that’s just what we do to prepare for roles. I know people who have had to get naked, eat people alive, and of course, cross-dress and sing dirty songs about the opposite (same) sex onstage. It’s just like playing in one’s backyard, but with more innuendo.
If they did, I don't think I would feel so alone.
As if that isn't bad enough, it seems that such schemes are being encouraged, or even suggested by the police, or at least by the local licensing bobbies that attend PubWatch schemes. Now you, like me, might think that if such a thing was suggested, that the licensees would firmly turn down these illegal suggestions and maybe would actually report such goings on. But no - it seems some go along with it, despite the fact that it is they, not the police that would end up in (quite serious) trouble for so doing.
"Now," he whispered, leaning in towards them, "where is the child?"
102) I hate doing dishes, too, but I'm always the one that does them, because I'm really, really anal about the dishes getting clean. I wash the dishes before they are put in the dishwasher, and I consider the dishwasher to be an autoclave. My ex-in-laws used to not even rinse the dishes before they put them in the dishwasher, and they used cold water for the dishwasher, and barely any soap, and then they let them air dry. When they took the dishes out of the dishwasher, they would just flick off the bits of dried food that were left on, and then put the dishes away. And they wondered why I didn't want to eat there.
Bake for 30 minutes at 350 degrees.
I’ve heard comparisons of Sunshine to Wes Anderson’s movies, and while the talented ensemble cast and general affection for oddity may connect to The Royal Tenenbaums, the stylization of the downwardly mobile lower-middle-class family feels much more like the films of Todd Solondz, particularly Welcome to the Dollhouse (placing a homely little girl at the center of the action doesn't hurt, either). Thankfully, Sunshine’s directors don’t dislike their characters as actively as Solondz does his, and as their nasty streak doesn’t reach as deeply, Sunshine comes off feeling rather light, if inconsequential.
directing, controlling or limiting the airflow around the motorcycle
Think of yourself if you are daydreaming or off in lala land while doing something else. You are not really connected with what you are doing, are you? If you were studying for a test of some sort and kept pretending something else, you wouldn't get very far with your learning, would you? This is no different for the child using the Montessori materials. Those materials ARE their "study materials". But not just any study materials: study materials to help them grow in the here and now.
In any event, we spent most of Tuesday on the beach. Since the sun set over the ocean, most people hung out on the beach until 6:00 p.m. sharp before heading to their rooms to shower for dinner and we were no exception. We only showered and slept in our room. Naps were taken on the beach, at the pool, or in the hammock on our porch so we were pretty much beach bums the entire week!
8. Paputsi
Chili paste 1 tablespoon
So, we watched it, him in tears because he wasn't actually there.
It’s a no brainer…
Unibroue Noire De Chambly / Chambly Noire
Might I tuck you up in your queen size bed
What’s in all this grand life and high situation,
Finding the right tools for a small space can be a challenge. Zach is an inventive guy. He makes his own 2 inch soil blocks; a size he has found works best for the crates. A mini hand seed spreader allows him to sow 400 sq. ft. within 15 minutes.
Prima Vox will be taking a couple of weeks off because I need to hyper-focus on the holiday concert music. But the Voxes will be making an appearance during that concert. They'll be my angelic backup during "The Basque Carol." While I'll be playing the sound of wings, they'll be echoing "Gloria."
102 - 7.2 million, 4.0/7
I found this song today and it touched me on these issues, especially as for those in USA it's mothers day today; enjoy.
Remember Daniel Guerra? Remember he was picked up in a car a stone’s throw from his house, by a parlour, and days later his body was found in the Tarouba waterway system?
Arsenal v Man United – 4.00 Sunday (Live on Sky Sports 1)
The bloke drags on his cigarette then pats his dog on the head.
It seems that our yard is no longer a construction zone, thankfully. Fences have been raised, pergolas built and all the tools and extra wood have been put away.
Growing up we unwrapped Christmas on Christmas Eve but Ben....he did it Christmas morning. As a mom I like the fact that I can send the kids off to bed, practically vibrating with excitement and some how they manage to keep theirselves in the bed all in the hopes of making it one.more.night! I'm a wee bit psychotic that way...but I find it funny.
Amber - A space that creates ease of use for both staff and patrons sets itself up for success. Often times people become so accustom to working in a certain environment or to a specific series of movements to get tasks accomplished, that they can’t see how it could be improved. Having a trained and objective eye gives us the ability to identify those areas and create spaces that are more efficient, productive and enjoyable.
I had been waiting for the right time to try the last of my Christmas/Winter seasonal beers. Santa's Butt was a Christmas present from Thad and ended up being a pretty nice present.
The list of Tinseltown luminaries who have resided here, either short or long term, include George Raft, Loretta Young, Clark Gable and William Frawley. Frawley had lived there a short few months when on a stroll down Hollywood Blvd., not far from his former residence at the Kickerbocker, he collapsed and died in front of Leeds Shoes. It has been erroneously stated that he was still living at the Knickerbocker when he died, not true. A former neighbor of Frawley's at the El Royale recalls Bill knocking on his door in the afternoons to borrow a walnut for his martini! (for those who imbibe, and are daring, try it and let me know) Judy Holliday lived there with her mother while she was filming "Born Yesterday". This fact is verified by no less than an FBI report. (well she might have been a commie, you know)
The failure of multiethnic countries to function is directly related with ethic communities’ disloyalty to the country.
Just turn it around! Now the front has a lovely boat-neck style, but the back is bare and chic, like in the '30s. This works with a modern t-shirt because there is almost never any shaping through the bust, due to the stretchy jersey fabric.
Narrator A pretty one with engravings? That sounds lovely. But what are you going to do about the gardener? Won’t he notice?
Whew! Aren’t we a persistent bunch!
Who knows, perhaps all of those labels are appropriate, but I'm not sure if that's a good or bad thing. What I can say is that, despite not having an easily identifiable sound, we don't intend to dumb down to a more uniform style throughout the next album just to make it easier to categorise The Millipede Engine. We have more faith in the listener as it's clear that people can handle a range of different flavours on one album quite easily.
I'm the one showing off now, but of that BBC list of books that is often linked on facebook with the tagline "the BBC thinks that the average person has read 6" I have read 79. I've put the list below just in case you haven't seen it before.
Two middle fingers, and a hearty "F--- you."
Just curious how you all feel about this.
With the emotional consequence of words
I’ve seen a few posts in the blogosphere where price has been dismissed as something of little importance, and comments have been made along the lines of “it’s worth paying more for really good beer.” However, unless you’re rolling in it, or only drink a couple of pints a week in the pub, price is not something that can be ignored. Most people have, to a greater or lesser extent, a limited budget and have to juggle and trade off various priorities in their lives.
To make this card I colored another foam egg and stamped dots and painted on top of it. There's the bunny image and some sparkly rhinestones layered on top. I added the confetti eggs and the die cut embellished butterflies. Put this all on patterned paper, tulle and some fiber for some dimension. I added the sentiment "Happy Easter" and I was ready to hop away!
Hail to the Husband of Isis, Strong in Magic–Rejoice! You are praised!
For me it's pretty much a decade, give or take, of being interested in sustainability, and nine years since we set up Ethical Corporation.
d = 293.66, g = 392 = I want
I finally found them, not on Payless.com, not on Zappos.com or even on Amazon.com. I found them on Sears.com! Who would have thought that Sears carries a whole line of shoes also to be found in online drag queen boutiques?
Spinal Muscular Atrophy (SMA) Overview 7
15. Writing on the Wall
Time will tell.
Here’s a cute little song – Fudepen Borupen (Fountain Pen, Ball Pen) – by the band Mio for the anime K-On! The song tells the story of a young girl hesitantly and shyly penning a love letter to her crush. It was one of many awesome songs I got to play. Sayonara, I guess. It’s been so so so much fun. *tear in eye*
Cera Flava – See Beeswax.
And although I've no easy answer for people who ask me what period of history I write in, you do have to have one, for the current project at least. I've had writers for whom their history is a period I remember; I've had others determined to set their novel in 12th Century China when they've never been further east than Vienna. Then there may be one or two, as at Guildford, who are writing historical non-fiction, but who feel that thinking like a novelist will make their history-writing better. That doesn't make a huge difference... or does it? What if your characters don't talk English - is that easier or harder than when they talk English, but it's Chaucer's? What if you can find very little material to draw on? What if you find too much? It can be even more paralysing: like trying to catch a waterfall in a cup.
“Yeah…I kind of like myself in that way, rather than now. I’ve certainly changed Munin. I’m losing that acquainted feeling…I have… with my aloneness.”
“Up yours, windbag.”
This week we are celebrating Easter. Religious celebrations have lost their soul in many public institutions. Schools are off for Spring Break and they no longer even fall within Easter Week. Easter is all about chocolate bunnies and chocolate eggs. Oh alright, I'm the one obsessed with chocolate but you get where I'm going. It can be tricky to do a curriculum around Easter even if all the students are Christian because there are so many different denominations and while the story is the same, the meaning varies from person to person. I remember being quite young and already being immersed in Catholic doctrine. Christ died for our sins. As a teacher, I don't feel comfortable discussing this particular topic with children that come from so many varied backgrounds. I tend to get very philosophical about Christ's death and about "our sins". I do however want to remain true to the celebration and meet children where they are.
decided to return to the mainland. I'd also been waiting to find out if I had been accepted
Indie newcomers Tape The Radio release their debut album ‘Heartache & Fear’, which they spent 3 years on, recording to perfection. The album stays true to its name and is full of songs really about heartache and fear, which listeners of all kinds will be able to relate to.
What woman doesn't like to feel good about herself? Feeling
This last winter saw more hardship, more strenuous community togetherness, more help-thy-neighbor-like-thy-life-depended-on-it gestures to make up for every snowless winter or heat-blistered summer of the new millennium.
Wine haired child of the Nysan cave
This week has been all about a very last minute wholesale order.
The slow build, which has lead up to the Frank backstory and the Crystal/Penny affair, culminates with a final rush of insight. We finally find out how these characters all come together, and in what way they all fit into the bigger picture. It’s an impressive move, which I should have seen coming, but I didn’t, for which I give all credit to Stanze (and Christ) as it caught me by complete surprise.
Every person deserves your love and attention.
Today I get to host my best bloggity friend on my blog for Shitty Movie Awareness Club! We're pretty much the best couple ever. Even Andy calls our soulmateness a steamy love affair, and it totally is. I imagine that when we finally do meet, there will be a beautiful, running through the airport, jumping into each other's arms kind of moment. Except maybe not the jumping in each other's arms part because I'd really hate to give her a hernia. (Can girls even get hernias?) (When I was little, I thought a hernia meant that a boy's penis had fallen off. Ouch.)
So I’m basically conversing with myself, and you’re along for the ride.
Police station commander, director Andre Wiese of the Lyttelton police station, said the citizen's policing-forum (PVR) members who went into hot pursuit in cooperation with the police patrols, have probably saved the lives of many. He praised them for their courage.
WARNING: Several references to puking (i.e. the liquid laugh, spray the puree) are made in this post. And I can think of only one person who will truly appreciate it. Stop now if you’d rather not know.
he has ever known
4 little
Any person in the Lexington area certainly loves a class with Phil Dunn. Watching Phil wield a pan of bubbling anything on that beautiful brick red AGA can excite a cook, or just about anybody who loves to eat. He never fails to get me planning my next meal or purchase a tool at one of his favorite local haunts! Shortcuts & tips are aplenty during each class.
To be eligible for the grant, libraries must be located in the continental U.S. and must register for the drawing online. For complete program details, go to www.sistersincrime.org.
It's appropriate I'm in my birthday suit.
Our friendship is remarkable in that it had the most interesting development. To connect beyond seeing each other at camp every summer, we became pen pals. When we realized that we didn’t live in different countries but rather the same state, we began to have occasional “playdates” and to attend each other’s birthday parties. Finally, once we had our own cars, we were able to hang out and go into business together in a plethora of start-up companies (i.e. our own magazine, our own TV show, our own photography studio, etc.). People are often surprised my friend and I never went to my high school because I talk about her so much!
For this attempt at a table beer I decided to use millet as my adjunct grain. When I was looking for exotic grains this was the only thing that I could find easily. Ive had millet a few times at ethnic restaurants and I wasn't really ever that impressed. It was always a slightly nutty mush pile that in my opinion need a bit of texture to make it worth eating. Somehow though I have a feeling that it will work in beer much better though. To try and help that along I decided to pan toast the millet until became fragrant and started popping. I'm hoping this will help to bring out the nutty flavors in the beer. Strangely thought toasting the millet didn't result in much color development.
… popularity is the spiritual currency of Hollywood’s art. That’s why we call it ‘pop culture.’
If you know that you belong to Him is it wise to try to work out the details of your own life? Is it right to leave the Lord out of your plans? Paul would not think of doing such a thing for this Roman trip was only of the Lord. He would rest in the Lord and wait patiently for Him.
Just little stuff. But it sure is fun.
To Bake Blind
The case is the second in recent weeks naming Mr. Yarrington, who ran the Mexico-Texas border state between 1999 and 2004. Two weeks ago, Mexico’s attorney general’s office said it had been investigating three former Tamaulipas governors, including Mr. Yarrington, since 2009.
Projecting her shadow over your wall.
I've had it on tap and from a bottle. I prefer the bottle version better. Come on though, 250 years and another slightly boring dry stout. Seriously. Give me a double stout, a chocolate stout, a milk stout, something a bit different. A bit special. Don't get me wrong, it's enjoyable, but I think 250 years calls for a little more pomp and circumstance.
Mr. Rao told the Bench, which included Justices D.K. Jain, S.S. Nijjar, Ranjana Desai and J.S. Khehar, that the court, while framing the guidelines, might take into consideration the relevant norms of journalistic conduct laid down by the PCI. Explaining the powers of the PCI, counsel said: “Section 14(1) of the Press Council Act confers on the Council power to warn, admonish or censure the newspaper, news agency, the editor and the journalist or disapprove [of] the conduct of the editor or the journalist, as the case may be, after holding an enquiry into the complaints. The Council, which is presided over by a retired judge of this court and in which editors, working journalists and managements of big, medium and small newspapers are represented, has laid down Norms of Journalistic Conduct. Self-regulation is always better than statutory regulation. However, when any TV channel, newspaper or news agency fails to adhere to the guidelines laid down by this court, appropriate orders may be passed in the facts and circumstances of each case.”
Ever since his ﬁrst ecstasy or vision of Christminster and its possibilities Jude had meditated much and curiously on the probable sort of process that was involved in turning the expressions of one language into those of another. He concluded that a grammar of the required tongue would contain, primarily, a rule, prescription, or clue of the nature of a secret cipher, which, once known, would enable him by merely applying it, to change at will all words of his own speech into those of the foreign one. . . .
Speaking of selling... if you want to buy anything at my Etsy site, (it's too late to get it before Christmas), you'll want to place your order in the next couple of days. I'm going to put it in Vacation Mode from Friday afternoon until next Wednesday. If you haven't been on there in a while (www.bumblebat.com), I have all the official Zentangle® supplies as well as all my books (get them signed!) Totally Tangled is being reprinted, again, by the publisher so it is hard to find. I have a few copies left and after the New Year, I'll have plenty more. AND! After the New Year, I should have my NEW BOOK!!! It's called Tangled Fashionista. I'll tell you more about it when I post it next week on Etsy.
Disclosure: I received a sample in exchange for my review, the opinions expressed are my own.
Author of The Rescuer's Path (2012, Plain View Press), a novel of love, courage, and family in the antiwar movement. Author of Time and Other Details (2006, Highlights Press), a selection of award-winning poetry on history, life, and other ephemera. Author of numerous stories and poems published in literary and other journals and anthologies. Freelance editor for university and trade presses. Former director, Rosenberg Award for Poems on the Jewish Experience. Former founding editor/facilitator, The Open Cell literary magazine/collective. Former newspaper reporter, museum public relations director, gallery readings director, etc.
Everywhere people cast their eyes in the science fiction thriller, ‘Minority Report’ from the casual walker, driver or runner each was beset by targeted advertising. It was overt and pervasive as the world was a blur of noise and distraction emanating from adverts seemingly everywhere. The additional component to the targeted ads is everyone was having their retina scanned as part of the societal security. We aren’t that far from this becoming a reality in our own lives.
So as you embark on or get real about your journey to spiritual and physical fitness, make sure you have all that you need and remove the obstacles you are able to. But thats not ALL you need… its not all about your effort and preparation, God wants to help to overcome those struggles, limitations and hinderances, if only you would submit your life to Him. "For it is God who works in you to will and to act according to His good purpose" Phil 2:13.
10:00 A.M. – 12:00 Noon
The fear is kicking in. It’s not just a fear of something tangible, its a fear of the unknown.
“I’ve seen lots of demonstrations of goodwill towards people, but never one that gained such momentum,” he said. “It’s something that’s very special that’s happening.”
He said that the country’s politicians are currently doing nothing better because they say things but refuse to put them on paper to help move the nation forward. On his chances of getting the nod as the CPP flag-bearer, Prof Akosa, told The Enquirer that his message has gone down well with the delegates and that he was sure of victory. “I have toured almost all the regions and met with the stakeholders of the CPP and strongly feel that something good will happen at the end of the congress,” he said.
Children became the Bone Spur in the Achilles Heel of My Attention.
So, much as many conservatives regret the Bush-era expansion of government, it may be the price one had to pay for George W. Bush's more active and realistic approach to protecting American security against the Islamic threat. With the difficult threat from abroad to cope with, Bush had no political capital left with which to take on the big-spending ways of Congress. His only option was to make the existing system work for him rather than against him. If Al Gore had been in charge, the U.S. would probably still have got the prescription drug benefit but with United Nations resolutions being the only measures taken to counter the Islamic threat.
Translation: Yes, it’s the sea breeze.
translated by Sam Taylor
I had a brilliant day and it gave me a real confidence boost! So I wanted to write this post to say a big thanks to Bev.
1 accidental
He sits there and stares at me for awhile, and then starts talking again. He asks, All you want is for Jen to come back and talk to you? Ignore. Thats what you said in your blog right? Ignore. Well, Im here. You dont fucking count, I yell. He asked, Do you want me to call her and tell her to come over? I replied, no (but of course thats what I wanted, but I knew she wouldnt be able to, Matt was at work, and the girls were sleeping). Are you sure, he asked, I can go out in the living and she can come in here and talk to you. I plugged my ears, and he started crying. This pissed me off, when Im like this I really have no empathy, all I could think is that he was just going to sit there and cry instead of doing something to “fix this”.
Source: YAHOO NEWS.
Now all the larch at the nursery have shed their needles I thought a post that features this family of trees, arguably one of the easiest and best for bonsai, would show how the winter image is an important part of this conifer species.
A female oyster over the course of her lifetime may produce as many as 100 million young.
Heart-Shaped Face: Aviators do not "heart" you back
Papillion is home.
I was one of those students who did well on tests. Apparently I had a good short-term memory, even for facts I didn't care about. And I did care about grades. That combination made me a strong student. But now, in my post-school life, it looks more like a weakness then a strength. It is a weakness, being afraid to admit to not knowing something. I hate it when I don't know an answer, or when people are talking about something I have never heard of. I expect myself to know everything. Because in the world of school, "I don't know" means you fail. And I almost never failed. The few times I did, it was not acceptable. Now I have to remind myself that it's OK not to know things. I have had to practice saying "I don't know."
This International Women’s Day I’m thinking about the women I didn’t meet in those many waiting rooms or at the pharmacy…women who didn’t have choices or treatment options because we’re still debating whether birth control is the tool of the devil when we should be celebrating increased access without co-pays and then pushing to expand access even more.
for this week's theme of snow
Perhaps unwittingly, Downfall seems to confirm suggestions made by the defence during the perjury trial: SSP witnesses were not just testifying to what they claimed was true but that they were actively seeking to have Sheridan convicted.
It makes such a good scare story, and it’s entertaining. It was a mildly interesting event, certainly, but not at all big-league stuff. It makes people think, “Oh it’s nothing really,” so experts like myself are in danger of being in the crying-wolf situation. That’s something that is a concern to me, personally.
This is the perfect image of the kind of sink I want. A big country kitchen bib sink (I think that is what they are called) which is mounted under the marble counters. This image just takes my breath away.
Because of gracious friends, my small, part-time income, and Matt's unemployment benefits, we were able to save even during this time. Then, 3 weeks after the birth of our daughter, Matt's dad passed away. He had owned his own business doing custom home building and remodeling. Within a few weeks, several of his clients were calling Matt to come finish what Roger had been working on. After a couple weeks of commuting, we felt that God was leading us to move for Matt to take over the business full-time. So, we packed up our stuff (which was already packed, in storage) and headed out here. We were blessed with the opportunity to live in Matt's granddad's house for just the cost of bills.
BF: US military jets.
Potatoes
Tom: Wow.
Given that skill set as a prerequisite, I would ideally like to see the “captain of the ship” come from within the rank and file of the sport. Primarily because I feel that this sport has some uniqueness about it that must be accounted for in attempting to develop and carry forth any sort of true strategic plan that would move track and field forward. I have watched some former elite level athletes perform well in administrative roles in the sport – Alberto Juantorena, Seb Coe, and Sergei Bubka come to mind – and I think that we have some former athletes that could possibly fit the bill. Remember that Craig Masback was himself a former miler and did a solid job as CEO.
Daniel- He's like the best dad ever
Fortunately, today Samuel had his "swallow study." Check out THIS VIDEO (crank down the volume first) showing what this kind of study looks like; it's pretty amazing, really. They bottle-fed Sam using a variety of thickened milk and bottle-nipple combos. Each time he swallowed, you could see where the fluid went and how. Sure enough: perhaps because of the paresis (not paralysis!) in his vocal cord, Sam aspirates just about every time he swallows. And what's more, Sam currently lacks either the awareness, the strength, or (sadly) the vocabulary to object like you or I would. We would cough, turn red, and complain about something "going down the wrong tube." Sam suffers in silence. These silent aspirations may be responsible for why he can't feed well. They also may be the root cause of his sporadic and uncontrolled saturation drops. When too much fluid builds up in his lungs, they just can't work properly, throwing off the whole synergy of the cardio-pulmonary system.
I have recently learned about a young Khmer dancer, Sy Sar, who was "discovered" by a Western filmmaker with a keen interest and involvement with ballet, director Anne Bass. She made a film about the way she was able to interest Western classical ballet dancers in his unique talent, and how a group of people joined together to get him the training and then the exposure he needs. He is now a coveted ballet dancer in the States and yet he has kept close ties with his roots back in Cambodia and works bringing dance and, thereby, a better life to the children there. This is an amazing story. The film is called Dancing Across Borders, and I urge you to go read about the film and the story behind it here. And in the meantime, check this out:
Food finally gone, I polished off my backup drink – a glass of Tank 7 – and then glanced over at Elizabeth with an “I don’t want to leave yet” expression. She read me perfectly and “insisted” that we stick around for a cup of coffee (French Press, of course). I grinned and reclined. And as I sat back, sipping the warm coffee, I thoroughly felt and enjoyed the relaxed, collected French vibe emoting from every detail of the place. No one rushing, yet with superb service. Tasteful yet somewhat sparse décor. So much attention to detail yet not enough detail to be fussy.
Card Stock: Core'dinations
I've read both of Julie Powell's books; while I liked Julie & Julia well enough , I had to skip over large portions of her follow-up book, Cleaving. I really didn't want to hear about her affairs, particularly since I thought her husband was a little bit of a saint based on the portrayal in her first book. Powell was somewhat more likable in the movie, but I've concluded that it was only because she was portrayed by Amy Adams, who has made a good career out of being cute and likable.
The sweet little barrettes got me to thinking about summer hair, though. I was big into barrettes a few years ago to keep my longish bangs off my face. It's a small but effective gesture. A funny incident: the best friend of my boyfriend at the time came to visit us in Texas, along with his girl from Washington state, who had built her own yurt using scrap material and ingenuity in her mother's backyard and who now lived with the best friend in another hand-built house on land they homesteaded in Alaska. She was a sturdy girl. Anyway, I could sense that she took an instant dislike to me, even though she kept exclaiming, "you're the cutest thing ever!" I don't think that was a compliment, quite, in her book. But the funny thing was that later that day when they were driving around, she made them stop into a drugstore so she could buy some barrettes.
Special Note: This is the last picture of me with these glasses.
When a friend of mine texted me, “MCA is dead! Long Live Paul’s Boutique!” I experienced both sadness and pride: sadness over MCA’s passing, but pride that MCA left behind over two decades music and cultural influence. Was there a band more representative of late Generation Xers than the Beastie Boys? From their obnoxious, sexist debut to their pop culture masterpiece Paul’s Boutique to their punk-funk-rap mash ups of the mid to late 1990s, few bands traversed the kind of sonic territory of the B-Boys. Yet as important as they were musically, MCA, “the King” Ad Rock, and Mike D proved equally important in terms of identity. Their music, politics and style enabled thousands of suburban/urban white kids find their pop culture footing. For suburban kids wanting in on 1990s hip-hop, but hoping to maintain a connection to punk and metal, the Beasties provided a third way.
14:50 : 16:30 Creating, Monitoring & Operating your Private Cloud
It made me realise that all day walks in sun, rain, snow, whatever nature has on that day, are what I love the very most about being mobile and fit.
A coffee franchise in most areas is a stable business decision. The hassle often arises when settling on one coffee franchise over its many worth competitors. There are lots of franchises available at the market that supply coffee as a main source of revenue. Contemplate a variety of the following things whilst deciding which coffee franchise is the very best one to satisfy your wants whereas promising the most strong financial long term for your business needs.
Hart has it all–a dukedom, wealth, power, influence, whatever he desires. Every woman wants him–his seductive skills are legendary. But Hart has sacrificed much to keep his brothers safe, first from their brutal father, and then from the world. He’s also suffered loss–his wife, his infant son, and the woman he loved with all his heart though he realized it too late.
It may have shaken away the Karajan-ness of Karajan, who (let's face it) was disliked for more than his music-making... But it has had the unfortunate side-effect of ghettoising the works of Bach, Haydn and Mozart so that few mainstream conductors dare touch them without applying supposedly "correct" mannerisms of phrasing, articulation and so forth - which often are not all that correct, especially when applied simply because they're a sound that's expected, rather than a concept that is properly thought through. Nothing is more dangerous than a little knowledge. I despair of ever hearing my favourite Mozart symphonies being played with any real gumption again, or without drums that sound like cornflakes packets, or without wince-worthy vibrato-less string tone - it's possible to make a good sound with no vibrato, of course, but frequently it doesn't happen. I am deeply unhappy about this: it's like being thrown into exile.
Here's project #1...
- Rhys
* denotes the song is a live version of his interpretation from An Old Time Christmas
There is so much to see and do. Every time we visit, we can see something new such as:
05-22 Adelaide, Australia – Entertainment Centre *
ADAM WILSON is the author of the novel Flatscreen. His fiction has appeared in many publications, including The Paris Review,Washington Square Review, New York Tyrant, Cousin Corinne’s Reminder, The Coffin Factory, and elimae, as well as the anthology Promised Lands: New Jewish American Fiction on Longing and Belonging. A founding editor of the The Faster Times and former culture critic for Blackbook, he is currently a regular contributor to Bookforum and The Paris Review Daily. His essays, journalism and criticism have appeared in The New York Times, The New York Observer, The Forward, The Rumpus, and the anthologies Dirty Words: A Literary Encyclopedia of Sex and A Friday Night Lights Companion: Love, Loss, and Football in Dillon, Texas. He holds an MFA from Columbia University, where he received a fellowship, and teaches creative writing at NYU and the Sackett Street Writer’s Workshop. He lives in Brooklyn with his cat.
Ruby (Rupert) Walsh rides for the champion stables of Paul Nicholls in Britain and Willie Mullins in Ireland and – along with Tony McCoy – leads the current generation of jump jockeys. Born May 14, 1979, and based in Co Kildare, Ireland , he is the son of 11-times Irish amateur champion jockey, Ted Walsh, now a trainer and television pundit. Ruby is the second of Walsh’s four children and his younger sister Katie is a successful amateur who had two wins at the 2010 Cheltenham Festival and will be aboard Seabass in the 2012 John Smith’s Grand National. Ruby’s other sister, Jennifer, acts as his agent. Ruby had his first success under Rules aboard Siren Song at Gowran Park on July 25, 1995, and followed in his father’s footsteps when capturing the Irish amateurs’ championship at the age of 19 while still studying for his Leaving Certificate. He was champion Irish National Hunt jockey in his first season as a professional (1998/99) and has taken the title a further seven times (2000/2001, 2004/05, 2005/06, 2006/07, 2007/08, 2008/09 and 2009/10). Walsh has won the John Smith’s Grand National twice on Papillon (2000, trained by his father) and Hedgehunter (2005). He is the most successful jockey of all time at the Cheltenham Festival with 34 victories and has been leading rider at The Festival six times (2011, 2010, 2009 (when he recorded a record seven winners), 2008, 2006 and 2004). His Cheltenham victories include the 2007 and 2009 Betfred Cheltenham Gold Cup with Kauto Star, three Queen Mother Champion Chases (2004 Azertyuiop, 2008 and 2009 Master Minded), the Champion Hurdle (2011 Hurricane Fly) and the Ladbrokes World Hurdle (2012, 2011, 2010 and 2009 Big Buck’s). There are few omissions in his list of big-race successes and he has also won five King George VI Chases on Kauto Star. His autobiography was published in October, 2010. He is married to Gillian and the couple have a daughter, Isabelle, who was born in October, 2009. John Smith’s Grand National Record: 2000 PAPILLON (WON); 2001 Papillon (4th); 2002 Kingsmark (4th); 2003 Shotgun Willy (PU bef 22nd); 2005 HEDGEHUNTER (WON); 2006
“They've got nothing to lose but people start mobilising against them and printing off leaflets.”
1996
Forgive me if this article turns a little too personal, but the truth is that I and many Puerto Ricans are going through an extremely difficult time in our history. We are currently being governed by a government with no love for its people. It gives a happy face to tourists and the media, but when it comes to its people, the masses, the poor, the middle class, well, then you see an entirely different face emerge. A violent, cold face, with no love or respect for those that put them in power. Kind of like those robot cops from George Lucas's THX 1138. Every step that our government is taking is to make their powerful grip on the country stronger. The police force is getting bigger, the national guard recruits fresh meat every day, all for the sole purpose of inflicting fear on the people, which I must say they have successfully done. I am not lying when I say that many Puerto Ricans walk in fear when they venture out into the streets. So, this is my personal reason for doing a special blog post about films dealing with revolution. It’s something I needed to do, to vent out all my thoughts and worries on this matter. Today I’ll be commenting on both of Steven Soderberg’s CHE films, on Oliver Stone's JFK and also on The Motorcycle Diaries, because it just feels appropriate, all things considered.
This incarnation refers to one of the many sexual positions to be found in the Kama Sutra. I think it is position number forty-two. I haven’t read this classic sexual “how to” manual in many years so I could be wrong about the number. And yes, your amusing musing is correct. I just looked at the illustrations. And speaking of illustrations, if any of you male readers actually happen to have a penis as freaking large as those in the illustrations of the Kama Sutra, and possibly have it resting in a wheel-barrow in front of you, please e-mail me a picture. While I am happily hetero-sexual, this would come under the heading of “This I’ve got to see!”
Ultimately, I wonder if I made a mistake sticking with the word “Odd” in the title. It originally made sense when I would write lavish posts about things that I found very weird in games. Like giant skeletons with no explanation, or how a huge dwarven dam looked like it was spitting at you, but now my rambling is less odd and more… well, I dunno what I can describe my writing as. I contemplated on Twitter about scrapping it all and starting fresh so I wouldn’t have that name sitting on my head, but at the same time I’ve grown quite attached to it. I’ve also been trying to push my posts to be more ‘personal’ and worry less about ‘objective content’ or worrying if something is necessarily ‘funny enough’. I suppose this post would be a good step in that direction but then again I am not sure.
Preheat oven to 350F. Line an 8- or 9-inch square baking pan with aluminum foil and lightly grease.
Because her father is Renauld, I know that she has only one gene for the white pattern and must have one for solid. There is a 50/50 chance for her to have a coloured lamb and that will tell me what colour(s) she has hiding under the white. And that will also give me a clue to what is under Eirina's white, too.
“Inception”, if there was a way to describe it; it would be “lucid dreaming to the extreme”. Christopher Nolan’s action/adventure thriller serves to expand our imaginations and look into the state of dreams. With the help of special effects and a blend of CGI, “Inception” is truly a movie worth looking at.
Wow! That was serious tangent.
Tiny Tim Patio Tomato - 36
They do this just as normal while everyday moms like me ride past to drop there kids off to school. The kids think it's soooo cool and I have to admit mommy does to.
Despite an unnatractive screencap, Kesse did pretty good. I really liked her cutesy appeal here and she worked the lines wonderful. I dont think she was particularly attractive looking, but thats probably just because I dont really like Kesse’s look as much as I could.
Grabbed his bedding, diaper bag,
My life won’t be this full always. Though I wish I had more of these wonderful balancing moments in my life now, I am also aware that our homeschooling and family lifestyle changes with the seasons. There may even be one day when my life feels off-kilter the other way and I long for some of the fullness and noise of my current experience. But for now, I am so thankful for this wonderful afternoon, and this week of restoring balance.
At Hudson Hills Golf Course
that is chosen from entries into our challenge.
To look yourself in the puddle and remind your heart how faithful God has been.
1/3 cup sweet yellow onion, diced
‘Plain Packaging of Tobacco Products in Australia: A Novel Regulation Faces Legal Challenge’ (2012) 307(3) Journal of the American Medical Association 261–262 (with David Studdert).
Brittni: “As you can tell, I love pink lipstick! I’m a recent lipstick user but I have come to discover that pink looks best on me. Once again, this isn’t a lip product that I actually own (yet) but I do love throwing it on when I’m at work. (The perks of the cosmetics world!) Clarin’s is a great skin care line so I wasn’t sure how much I’d like the makeup, but once I tried this color I fell in love!”
Today in psychology class we were talking about wearing masks throughout your life. Sometimes those masks are needed, such as when you're at work vs when you're with your friends. Most of the time, you can't act the same in both places. So when you're at work or with your friends you wear the appropriate mask. Those are, apparently, "healthy masks". I raised my hand and asked "what are unhealthy masks?" I knew the answer already, if I had just sat and thought about it I would've figured it out, but I was too quick to get an answer. Or maybe it was just something that I needed to hear, rather then think. He said "an unhealthy masks is one you wear after a trauma, emotional or physical. Sometimes it becomes second nature and you don't even think about it anymore, it becomes a part of you. Eventually though, your two worlds collide and your unhealthy mask will fall and your healthy mask will prevail." I just laughed to myself because could he be reading my mind or know my situation any more? I mean, really? Trauma? Unhealthy masks? Apparently I am, in fact, a cliche.
*check her blog for an EXTRA discount coupon too*
(49) The “time of the End” for the writer of Daniel was, of course, the writer’s own time—the time of the persecution under Antiochus IV Epiphanes—and thus he was representing his work as being a message from the past that was presumably discovered in his own day.
Good banana and orange peel nose. The taste is high banana and yeasty esters. It's kind of lemony for my taste and has moderate carbonation. This is certainly Bavarian and very well done, however the lemon knocks it from a 4 to a 3 star.
- All-Clad
They wouldn’t let me in so I’m off to a popular Dim Sum restaurant in Puchong for lunch.
5. Already Gone
Saves The Day - Sonic Reducer
What brought about the end of your relationship with Decca Records? And did you and Jay continue to perform together?
And in India:
Be Part of the Conversation
“We can accept that Penang’s land title is higher than in Sarawak, but it cannot be higher than 35.8 times,” he said adding that because the state government refused to use the open tender system in the sale of state land, Sarawakians were only getting “three to five percent of prices which are quoted.”a
Next year, nearly 50 000 South African students will leave for university or college for the very first time. Their education will cost about R52,000 (including residence fees) per year at a major university. Scholarships and grants reduce the cost for some families, but still, the average student leaves university with R150,000 in debt.
Seems the theme of last week’s articles and blogs were pretty uniform. It was all big dicks and anal sex. I don’t really have anything to say about anal sex but I am willing to throw my two cents in about the well-endowed. It all started with an article Why I Hate My Giant Dong written by Charles Allen for The Good Men Project. It was an article in which he documented the mixed blessings of having a massive member. Within hours of the article’s posting every female magazine on the web had commented.
It wasn't 'human relations' that stopped me from pursuing my passion. It was simply that I lost interest. I lost the passion for art making. It just--fizzled away. I don't know why.
'I don't think that we should eat it,' I said, looking forlornly at the newly iced cake.
This week has been pretty rubbish weather wise but we've had plenty to keep us occupied, not least preparing for the church charity Easter fayre. I co-ran the craft stall with a friend, and we had a fab time both making and selling. I did a basket of small knitted toys.
And sometimes, if I was really lucky, it would surprise me and drip into my eye.
But wait there's more! The best entry, ie.e the best poem, word play, story, etc as chosen by myself, will be the runner up and receive the pencil not selected by the winner.
I've been crying lately
The official box, in the shape of an antler, was unearthed from underneath the aldermanic bench amidst much amusement, and the Mayor promised ere another sitting the article in question should be duly cleaned and replenished with the stimulating powder.
Voting for Harper is a slap in the face to the democracy you are exercising on May 2nd. Hell, his people have tried to steal a ballot box of advance votes (by a group that is least likely to support him)! If none of the other parties appeal to you, but democracy does, abstain. Things will only get worse from here under Harper. At least your voice will still be heard under, oh, any other party.
Reflections on one’s mortality curiously makes one come alive to the incredible amounts of inanity and fanaticism that surround us, much of which is inflicted on us by ourselves. Which brings me to the next point, best stated as Postman’s Third Law:
Matchups, rematches and revenge: There are only three rematches in Round 1 tonight. Austin Meier hopes for a little revenge on Facial Fear, while Ross Coleman hopes to score another qualified ride on Show Stopper. Kody Lostroh has been on McClintock twice before, but not since 2007.
On a somewhat related note;
About Moby Wrap:
Contact marbiol at uw.edu with questions.
Surprisingly, I found myself having a hard time finishing it. This is a lot of SWEET for one sitting. While the initial sips were delicious, I do believe this is too much of a good thing. I never thought I'd say it, but this is just too sweet. At 22 ounces, the Southern Tier Creme Brulee Stout would make a great after-dinner drink with someone snuggly--IF they like sugary booze.
The popularity, and importance in China, of free, online U.S. college-course videos (humanities, social sciences, engineering and technology).
It's a straight up hip-hop record. There's no instrumental funk jams (which they probably got out of their system last time, on the instrumental album The Mix-Up). There's no hardcore punk, or hard rock jams.
“You promised me you will take care of me, you will always be with me until the day I died. Now you left before me, how am I going to live without you?!” Xu spent days softly repeating this sentence and touching her husband’s black coffin with tears rolling down her cheeks.
Even the concept ‘compassion’ can carry meaning of pity, caring.
I got 5 pink begonia's all of the same size and colour which set me back about £20,-.It's not my favourite plant by all means, but it was the cheapest .And hopefully the easiest to keep alive . It looked pretty cheerful. Plus my track record with orchids is not good.I only managed to keep 1 alive for a year , years ago.
- Presentation by representatives for the Department of Transportation on their findings and recommendations regarding the Prospect Park West bicycle lanes and traffic calming project installed in Summer 2010.
PLACEMENTS
Mean while 12 years later, Abigail moves into a town in the Ozarks. She begins to make her new home and begins to feel safe. At this point she was able to get an education in safety and security. She is still gifted on the computer so she uses it to her advantage. As she lives in the town she beings to become part of it. Meeting people and starting new relationships. She meets a man named Brooks that is Sheriff and they begin to date each other. Now here lies the problem.
This area tends to be one that is always a challenge to figure out. Piles of shoes, jackets, winter gear.... The most unsightly of items, yet a crucial place in our home. Many times, this area just isn't big enough and space both on the floor and the wall is somewhat limited. Which typically requires some critical thinking!
1st side:
Black jeans: Levi's
So I used painter’s tape to make a kind of barrier from the bottom edge of the window frame and to the screens sitting just outside of them. It seemed to help. I had to kill three of the little fuckers before I went to bed, but they might have gotten in before I put the tape-thingie in place. And I only got bitten at the beginning of the night, which is sort of weird because I don’t remember killing any of those creepy vampire things during the night. All I know though is by the end of the night everything was fine. Let’s see how tonight is before I pat myself on the back too much. But I paid off most of my sleep debt from the night before. Which was dragging my ass around the office yesterday afternoon.
The biggest thing that has been happening to me is learning how to change my habits.
My husband and I are pack rats. We don't like to throw anything away in case someone we know or we will need it some day in the future. If it is still in working condition, or has no damages we try to find some justifiable excuse to keep it. Especially in the clothes department.
One thing I noticed in a lot of the dresses currently selling at Topshop is the generous use of neutral tones favoured by 'classic' mori girls in Japan.
I love books. I love everything about them. Their smell, the pages, the ink, the glue used in the binding. And most of all I love the story so neatly contained within those pages, waiting to take me away. If I know a movie is based off a book, I always want to read the book first.
Drive armies on; make tyrants pause;
⁃ Fabric Wool from the Op Shop – $10
And little does she know that searching throughout London for her is her sweetheart, Charles. . .
After the tremendous success of Psycho in 1960 (this was the most popular Alfred Hitchcock film ever at the box office), the director turned his attention to an equally shocking story, The Birds in 1963. While some critics were openly disappointed with this work, The Birds shows Hitchcock at the power of his storytelling genius and remains in my mind, one of the top ten films he ever made.
Milestone DATE WHEEL.
The concept of using alternate first person narratives (changing between Sarah and Little Bee) is something that adds to the book’s effortless fluidity. Not only does it wrap the reader up in this story that little bit more, but in fact keeps the story fresh and stops it from turning laboured.
The really exciting part about the photography is that David’s friend Katie has a friend that is a photographer (a professional) and we’re meeting her tomorrow afternoon to go over her packages. If the package is affordable Katie is giving us that as our wedding present. Isn’t that just amazing and sweet? I’m so awed by everyone’s generosity.
Despite the hopeful change in the season things have not been so easy for us here. It's been a week when normally I would not have posted. I like to keep my blog uplifting if I can but I'm co-hosting Making Winter Week and sometimes it helps to write things down.
Clock tower
I had no idea how big Snoqualmie is. For some reason, I was thinking Snoqualmie would just have one central parking lot where we all pile out and head off to the ski slopes or to the tubing area or to the snowshoeing area.
For me, children are people who thrive with unconditionality, explore with freedom, learn with choice, and love with example.
Out of all the categories that comprise ‘serious violence’ which the British Crime Survey considers in its report, domestic violence has the highest percentage, 45%, of repeat victimisation, and repeat victimisation accounts for 73% of all incidents of domestic violence. In the majority of incidents of domestic violence the victims were women i.e. 85%.
Funny isn't it that we always focus on the negative even though the positive is right in front of us.
After writing The Feminine Mystique, Betty Friedan did a lot of work rewriting her history. In interviews, she has described herself as completely apolitical prior to writing the book. She claims that it wasn’t until the 1960s that she experience a feminist awakening. And as far as any union or radical activity? Forget it. But as Daniel Horowitz (a former colleague of Friedan’s) uncovers in his book Betty Friedan and the Making of ‘The Feminine Mystique,’ Friedan was deeply involved in radical feminism and labor activism as early as her time at Smith College. At Smith College she was involved in radical, anti-interventionist groups like the American Youth Congress. She wrote papers describing her Marxist, anti-capitalist views. Her senior year, she edited the Smith newspaper, using her power to espouse her anti-interventionist views in spite of immense public support of WWII.
The school arranged sessions with all 400 plus children... so it was a busy couple of days. But perhaps the most exciting moment was when a large anniversary cake was revealed, with Katie painted on the icing, with the words "Happy 21st Anniversary". Most extraordinary of all was that, by pure chance, this was October 4th, my sister's birthday. And as anyone interested in Katie surely knows, my sister Kate is the original. She was at home nursing a cold, so was greatly cheered by the news that the entire Junior department of the British School of Paris were saluting her by singing Happy Birthday to You, twice. Once in English; once in French.
And I’ll be much happier and much less neurotic if I remember that.
He died on a Sunday. The funeral was nine days later, on a Tuesday. Why so long? It's a tradition in the UK. Another custom is to celebrate the person's life. Therefore there was music on that sad day. A The Beatles compilation played on piano welcomed those in attendance, followed by a rendition of Standing on a Corner by Frank Loesser. Irving Berlin's Blues Skies was another melody performed that day and sung by a choir. After the service the family went to a pub where I'm sure - I couldn't join them - many an anecdote about this man's life was shared, many a moment was relived. The "rain did rain upon him" in the end, but amidst the grief, I'm certain that for an instant everyone had the same thought: how lucky they were for having had him in their lives.
85 to 89 points (= Highly Recommendable)
On the one hand, I find myself viewing vulnerability as a weakness and
A friend forwarded this to me ... and refused to accept credit for it; instead, he claims the Internets wrote it. I post it here with apologies to the four remaining moderate Republicans in America.
And Janis Joplin.
Tell you more about it later.
Note: I can’t help but to ask “wtf?” to the idiotic police officer who is more excited that his “beautiful face ” is on the international news.. bah..humbug..
(Click on images to enlarge; once it opens you
How can I go without saying to my kid that I really love him, I really do care for him ??
My kids are still young, but it is exciting to see them grow and learn. I want them to be kids for a long time, but I also can't wait to see what kind of young adults they turn into.
CEO, Turn Off The Television
Sadly, this was a little before my time, but I sure could use a 40¢ Super De-Lux Ham Sandwich and a 25¢ Malted Milk right now. How about you?
At one of the classes my teacher announced to everybody that I was going to be learning to teach burlesque, our deadline is next summer now for that.
Moving on, someone else asked Tarantino to name any films he'd be embarrassed to admit he'd not seen. Perhaps he was too embarrassed to list any specifically but he went on to talk about Fellini and European directors that he'd had difficulty enjoying. He made rather a interesting observation that he felt it was a mistake to go straight for films that are considered "classics" or the auteur's best.
Of course, I simply had to capture the first snow with my camera and thus I hope you will indulge me one more time, as I share with you the images of our overgrown lawn. I have shown it previously covered with droplets of dew in early autumn and the first frost in late October.
Old Man Baking Soda Sat,
Tonight’s dinner offering, was something I heard one of the ladies mention at group the other day.
#13 What kind of person do you think the person who tagged you is?
I think I’m getting closer to narrowing down the names for each of our girls. We’ve got 4 that I recognize easily–Amelia, Captain Janeway, T’Pol, and Uhura. That leaves 7 of 9 (another Star Trek reference), Obadiah, and two unnamed girls. Amelia is a Rhode Island Red, Captain is a Brahma, T’Pol is the Wyandotte with the single comb, and Uhura is the Brahma who isn’t Captain. So we have two Rhode Island Reds and two Wyandottes, and I can’t distinguish between the two in each pair. So I’m thinking that the R.I. Reds will be Mary and Martha and the two Wyandottes will be Obadiah and 7 of 9.
Last night tho, super different from anything else I ever experienced. The sheer amount of gassy acid in my stomach was down right painful. It was a churning and churning that laying down on my back, stomach even sides was gross. I tried to make myself puke, in hopes of releasing the fire within… my body wasn’t having it and said, this is purposeful. Dammit.
Individual– Art has the ability to evoke special feelings inside of an individual. The fact that art makes people feel special is undeniable and relates directly to every human’s need “to embellish, decorate and personalize,” writes Cathy Malchiodi. In her recent blog post, What is Art For? The Restoring Power of Imagination, she explains how important art is to an individual because of our unique taste for aesthetically pleasing design and appealing imagery.
which has some notoriety as a result of the fact that the Eagles, which toured with Tull in ‘72, used the same chord progression in “Hotel California”. Different key, different time signature, but Ian Anderson noticed as well, and graciously said in an interview that he considered it “a tribute, much in the same sense as the tribute Rolex watch I’m now wearing.”
It is impossible to imagine anyone other than Stephen Fry reading Harry Potter. Impossible. We have played this set of cds (9 hours + in total) over and over again, and we will never tire of it. At least, I won't.
The eugenics movement was one of the most hideously evil things to ever exist. The communist/socialists/progressives ate it up. It gave them the “scientific” excuse they needed to implement controls on their populations. It was the global warming of the 1930s. But I digress.
This tree has always intrigued me. It looks like the tree is screaming. It reminds me of the Sleepy Hollow Movie with Depp.
Taylor had to go stand out on the corner in a full body dog suit to bring business in to Petland. I think she sort of enjoyed being in disguise for a time.
I want you to be happy and complete with yourself emotionally and mentally, and then I want to see if I can fit in there somewhere.
Lord I believe that You are calling
“What if I said there was this RACE problem and this RACE problem would be solved only if hundreds of millions of non-blacks were brought into EVERY black country and ONLY into black countries?”
My current painting obsession is my mini-paintings that I call flapjacks. When I finish a few and stack them up, they looked like a stack of flapjacks. They're quick, colorful and people love them!
Maybe a bit younger, cause what I did back then was a bit retarded.
Here was Christine in NJ's entry:
The controversy is the same every year as well. And not the ‘who’s up who’ dissection of every soap opera cast or the ‘how many warm Crownies til someone does something news-worthy’ kind of debate - but the nominations that cause the most froth and bubble. Each year the Greatest Side Show on Earth revolves around who got the nods and who should’ve been shot.
I squeezed her hand, and then walked into the dim morning light.. Behind me, a door shut.It was the sound of the closing of a life..
Most of the products that have made it to market labeled as moonshine, such as Junior Johnson's Midnight Moon, from Piedmont Distillers, are either vodka or corn whiskey. Midnight Moon is vodka, distilled from corn. Georgia Moon, a venerable product made by Heaven Hill, is corn whiskey.
And with us, he is a complete and total basketcase. So awful. Horrible. Ick. Yuck. And ‘nasty’.
Who expects these things in friends, in quiet lovers. He was looking at me, laughing at his story. I saw how beautiful he was. And it seemed to me that he was saying "Let it be for now."
Then, I clicked back over to my e-mail (in tears of joy, mind you) and saw this subject “Adopted Teen Troubles”. It was from “Parenting Today’s Teens” with Mark Gregston http://www.heartlightministries.org/blogs/markgregston/ . It is a daily e-mail I have been getting for months now. Now, you might think this subject line would scare me off, but instead, it THRILLED me that GOD would send this e-mail the very day that we agreed to adopt a teen boy from China.
Looking back in time we see that hindsight is 20/20. But that still doesn't offer an explanation as to why a film like Mystery Men tanked so hard at the box office. Mystery Men was, to use modern day terms, sort've like The Avengers before Marvel even had Marvel Studios or any of it's Iron Man films in the works--just with no-name heroes. But who better to play no-name heroes than big-name movie stars? That's something that Mystery Men has in spades: star power.
Deirdra: Were you ever discouraged along the way? If so, how did you deal with it?
That is until now! I wanted to go for something in the region of 3.8% that is bitter but still retains some body and malt presence. I wanted it to be a medium dark bitter and I also wanted to use some ingredients up.
Anyway, we waffled with teaching Dante the pledge beforehand without the 1950s Cold War era addendum but decided against it, believing that this would be a form of indoctrination that we, as Atheist parents, are completely against when it comes to religion and the like. Let him learn and say the Pledge, whatever. It's not going to turn him into an evangelist sidewalk bible thumper. Hell, I played the "virgin" Mary in a Xmas pageant when I was a kid and I turned out ok. I also recited the pledge throughout my elementary years and was not scarred from it. (Incidentally, I now do not say or stand for the pledge because I understand it to be a load of bullshit and I don't "pledge allegiance" to any flag or country. My allegiance is with my family, so stuff it. But, as an adult, that is my choice and my right.)
It looks beautifully calm in these pics, but they were taken at either end – en route, there was a heavy, choppy swell, and the return journey, with a cross swell, was most uncomfortable. Unfortunately, we couldn’t get permission to land – not quite that much freedom, today. Our oldest rower was 75. The total distance, not including wild zigzagging, was around 17km.
in front of the wall the street is bathed in flat streetlamp light that manages to be both orange and grey at the same time
I really don't like dealing with American Idiots (AI - also known as arsehole intelligence). Throughout my years on (and off) the planet, I have encountered many strange people but - to paraphrase Clint Eastwood - "A Goth's got to know his limitations".
I asked him about his writerly fascination with sex. "Sex," Fuentes said, "as anything else in life, is an avenue to literature. Without literature, it would have no meaning. I am a literary animal. For me, everything ends in literature."
According to the clear testimony of the Scriptures, these Apostles had once been rather ordinary men – like you and me. Their faith hadn’t always been strong. They made mistakes. They committed sins. They were often afraid and confused.
The weakest students found it all too much. Who was this bloke in the gown reading one page after another in this measured tone, going on and on about things that were too hard to understand? Why spend time reading a hymn sung by the brahmins to frogs?
I believe that offering a certain ethnic or religious minority group a scholarship opportunity or “affirmative action” without factoring in income, environment, or other factors is wrong. Offer scholarships to the poor, and foster advancement for struggling students – who cares if they’re Hispanic or 1/16th Cherokee? Intelligence or motivation to succeed has nothing to do with your race, right?. Funny how liberals claim to be proponents of the “plight of minorities,” – all they emphasize is which minority is this week’s “Flavor of Suffering.”
State Assemblymen for Chenderiang
My favorite examples of grammatical borrowings are two strange formations found only in Welsh and English: the auxiliary ‘do’ verb for questions and negatives (Where do you live?; I don’t know), and the progressive present tense as the default present tense (“I am eating“; not: “I eat”, like in almost every other language). Anyway, most of the grammatical features, syntax, semantics, etc., are more interesting to linguists; ‘normal’ people are generally more interested by words. ’Vocabulary’ (Latin vocabularius) and ‘lexicon’ (Greek lexikon) both have the same etymological meaning of ‘words’, which first came from the verb ‘to speak’ in both examples. Given that there are so many words in English, and so many speakers (and readers), perhaps it would be interesting to know how many words the average speaker knows. Surely it is impossible for anyone to reach even a quarter of the supposed million-word threshold, especially considering that a great percentage of those are technical and specialized words or jargon.
This was one of those times. He's prescribed antibiotics. I've never taken antibiotics before. Well, you have to go to the doctors to get them so I wouldn't, would I?
Tonight, Lee and I hosted the youth at our house for a movie night. We ate pizza and other junk food and watched the movie, “To Save a Life.” If you haven’t seen this movie, you should go rent it and watch it.
Here is a picture of the moon and Venus.
Germany is again faced with a question of which way to go. If France is agreeable to keeping the North Sea and the Norwegian Sea neutral, then Germany has a secure backyard. An attack through central Europe is now probably the most profitable venture. With an established front from Munich to Moscow, the German armies have plenty of options. Of course, again there is the problem of the southeastern powers constructing a stalemate line–which is not that difficult a task on that part of the board.
Bass - Jerome Harris
Tomorrow is Friday!
Now… I was never in any real danger. Another couple of feet and he would have recognized me – at the very least – as the girl with the hotdogs. (Not as cool as ‘the girl who was on fire’, but I’ll take what I can get.)
